<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88802-0020 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-02-88.f2.A1019</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 148 / Tuesday, August 2, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Occupational Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 1926</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. S-409]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Crane or Derrick Suspended Personnel Platforms</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Occupational Safety and Health Administration, U.S. Departmentof Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)hereby amends its Construction Standards for Cranes and Derricks, 29 CFR1926.550, by adding a new paragraph (g) to prohibit the use of cranes orderricks to hoist personnel except in the situation where no safe alternativeis possible, and as long as the requirements for such hoisting set outin paragraph (g) are satisfied. OSHA initiated this rulemaking action toestablish clearly the conditions under which employees on personnel platformsmay be hoisted by cranes or derricks, and to insure that this informationis readily available to employers. The intended effect of this regulationis to increase safety for workers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>October 3, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Mr. James Foster, OccupationalSafety and Health Administration, Office of Information and Consumer Affairs,Room N-3637, U.S. Department of Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue NW., Washington,DC 20210, Telephone: (202) 523-8148.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>Congress amended the Contract Work Hours Standards Act (40 U.S.C. 327 <T3>et seq.</T3>) in 1969 by adding a new section 107 (40 U.S.C. 333) toprovide employees in the construction industry with a safer work environmentand to reduce the frequency and severity of construction accidents andinjuries. The amendment, commonly known as the Construction Safety Act(CSA), significantly strengthened employee protection by providing occupationalsafety and health standards for employees of the building trades and constructionindustry in Federal and federally financed or federally assisted constructionprojects.The Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 650 <T3>et seq.</T3>), expanded coverage to virtually all employments, andauthorized the Secretary of Labor to adopt established Federal standardsissued under other statutes, including the CSA, as occupational safetyand health standards. Accordingly, the Secretary adopted the constructionstandards issued under the CSA as OSHA standards on May 29, 1971 (36 FR10466) and redesignated these rules as 29 CFR Part 1926 on December 30,1971 (36 FR 25232). The standard entitled ``Cranes and Derricks,'' andSection;1926.550, was adopted as an OSHA standard in Subpart N of Part 1926 aspart of this process.Paragraph (b)(2) of andSection; 1926.550 requires employers to ensure thattheir crawler, locomotive and truck crane operations meet the applicablerequirements in the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) standardB30.5-1968, ``Safety Code for Crawler, Locomotive and Truck Cranes.'' Section5-3.2.3(e) of ANSI B30.5-1968 provides that ``the operator shall hoist,lower, swing, or travel while anyone is on the load or hook.'' Section5-3.2.1.4(r) of the most recent ANSI edition (1982) retains the ban onriding a bare hook or a load of material.A similar requirement appears in section 6-3.3.3 of ANSI B30.6-1984, ``SafetyCode for Derricks,'' which requires that ``the operator shall not hoist,lower, or swing while anyone is on the load or hook.''Ever since OSHA first adopted the CSA standards, the construction industryhas expressed concern as to the application of the above-described provisions,particularly with regard to whether they should be interpreted to prohibitthe hoisting of personnel platforms, sometimes also known as man basketsor man-skip boxes, by cranes and derricks. OSHA's approach to this questioncan best be understood by examining the chronology of this rulemaking.In 1972, a group of Florida contractors requested that OSHA clarify themeaning of the andSection; 1926.550(b)(2) ban on ``riding the hook.'' OSHAresponded that, where there were no other practical alternative means oftransporting employees, no citations would be issued under andSection; 1926.550(b)(2)provided that employers took specified measures to safeguard hoisted employees(Ex. 2-1).In 1973, OSHA received an ANSI B30 Committee interpretation of ANSI B30.5,section 5-3.2.3(e). ANSI interpreted the section as referring to the hoistingof employees on the hook itself or on normal material loads, such as beams,girders or concrete buckets. The committee further stated its view thata specially designed scale box or other guarded platform for personnelthat was attached to the crane hook was permissible under controlled conditions(Ex. 2-2).Also in 1973, the Boeing Corporation applied to OSHA for a variance fromthe application of andSection; 1926.550(b)(2) to its personnel hoisting operations.OSHA determined that Boeing did not need a variance because Boeing's speciallydesigned suspended work platform was not a ``load.'' OSHA further statedthat riding and working on these platforms while using a lifebelt-lifelinesystem did not constitute riding the hook (Ex. 2-3).In December 1973, the Advisory Committee on Construction Safety and Health(ACCSH) appointed an informal subgroup to examine this issue, to evaluatethe need for regulatory action, and to make recommendations to the fullcommittee.On July 30-31, 1974, the ACCSH subgroup held a public meeting in whichinterested parties were invited to participate (Ex. 2-4). The ACCSH subgroupreviewed the comments received, along with data developed by the subgroup,and prepared recommendations for consideration by the full committee. OnOctober 30-31, 1974, the Advisory Committee voted to recommend that OSHAinitiate rulemaking to regulate employee hoisting operations. (Ex. 2-5).Since 1975, OSHA has issued four interpretations which provided guidelinesfor the use of crane suspended work platforms (Exs. 2-6, 2-7, 2-8 and 2-9).On October 8, 1981, the provisions of these guidelines were incorporatedinto OSHA Instruction STD 1-11.2A. (Ex. 2-10). That instruction, in turn,was replaced by OSHA Instruction STD 1-11.2B on August 8, 1983 (Ex. 2-11).Despite the issuance of these guidelines, there have been persistent questionsabout the required equipment and procedures, and a rising toll of fatalitiesand injuries among hoisted employees. In particular, OSHA is concernedthat those guidelines, since they are generally available only to complianceofficers, are not known to employers who might be hoisting personnel. Therefore,employers might learn about the approved procedures only after an inspectionor accident investigation has taken place.OSHA determined that these administrative interpretations of andSection;1926.550(b) have not provided adequate guidance for employers or protectionfor workers. OSHA initiated this rulemaking action to establish clearlythe conditions under which employees on personnel platforms may be hoistedby cranes or derricks, and to insure that this information is readily availableto employers.Accordingly, OSHA developed a draft proposed rule, which incorporated thebest available information on feasible equipment and work practices, languagefrom an adopted but then unpublished revision of ANSI B30.5, and a draftANSI A10.28 ``Crane or Derrick Suspended Work Platforms,'' which had notyet been adopted by ANSI (Exs. 2-14 and 2-15). The draft OSHA proposalwas discussed by ACCSH on May 23 and 24, 1983 (Ex. 2-12). The recommendationsof ACCSH were substantially the same as those received by OSHA in 1974,and are discussed in the preamble in conjunction with the appropriate provisions.In addition to the ACCSH review, OSHA distributed drafts of the proposalto interested parties. The Agency received 30 comments, which divergedsubstantially regarding the limits to be placed on personnel hoisting.On October 31, 1983, ANSI formally issued its revised B30.5, in which section5-3.2.2 provided guidelines for personnel hoisting.On February 17, 1984, OSHA issued a notice of proposed rulemaking (NPR)(49 FR 6280). The Agency proposed adding a new paragraph (g), regulatingthe use of crane or derrick hoisted personnel platforms, to 29 CFR 1926.550,``Cranes and derricks.'' The NPR established a sixty day period, whichended April 17, 1984, for submission of written comments. The commentsreceived raised a number of important issues and included a hearing request.As discussed below, commenters were particularly concerned with the proposedscope and application of the standard, equipment safety factors, anti-two-blockingprecautions and testing requirements.On June 20, 1984, OSHA announced that it would convene an informal publichearing on September 11, 1984, and extended the period for submitting testimony,documentary evidence and additional comments until August 10, 1984 (49FR 25248). On July 26, 1984, the Agency rescheduled the hearings to beginon September 18, 1984 (49 FR 30077). The hearings were held on September18-19, 1984, with Administrative Law Judge Leonard N. Lawrence presiding.At the close of the hearings, Judge Lawrence set a period, ending November7, 1984, for the submission of additional comments and information. OnJanuary 25, 1985, Judge Lawrence certified the hearing transcript and relatedsubmissions, closing the record for this proceeding.OSHA received 92 comments in response to its NPR and hearing notices. Awide range of employees, businesses, labor unions, trade associations,state governments and other interested parties contributed to the developmentof this record. OSHA appreciates the efforts interested parties have madeto help develop a rulemaking record which would provide a sound basis forthe promulgation of a final rule.Based on its review of the record, OSHA has determined that hoisting withcrane or derrick suspended personnel platforms constitutes a significanthazard to hoisted employees, and that it will not be permitted unless conventionalmeans of transporting employees are not feasible, or unless they presentgreater hazards. OSHA has determined that compliance with the provisionsof this standard will provide the best available protection for hoistedpersonnel, in those limited situations where personnel hoisting is necessary.Employees who are hoisted in crane or derrick suspended personnel platformsare exposed to several serious hazards, including being spilled from theplatform or having the platform dropped while they are on board. Thesehazards, whether caused by mechanical failures or human errors, can resultin fatalities and crippling injuries to the hoisted personnel. Those samehazards would simply cause inconvenience and monetary loss when constructionmaterials are spilled or dropped.As the accident reports presented below indicate, many things can go wrongin a personnel hoisting operation. For example, ``two-blocking,'' one ofthe most serious and commonly experienced hazards, occurs when a craneoperator who is adjusting the elevation of a platform or the length ofthe crane boom causes the load block on the load line to contact the boomtip, thereby severing the load line and dropping the platform to the ground.Employees can also be injured or killed when a crane tips due to inadequatestabilization; when they ride the hook or a material load attached to ahook; when employers improperly select, assemble and maintain their cranes,derricks and personnel platforms; when the position of the platform orits occupants shifts suddenly; and when the platform is overloaded. Overloading,in particular, results when a crane attempts to hoist a weight which exceedseither the stated capacity of the crane or the crane capacity as limitedby worksite conditions.OSHA determined, in the course of preparing the regulatory analysis forthis rulemaking, that accidents resulting from the use of cranes or derricksto hoist personnel result in approximately 63 injuries annually. Of thoseinjuries, approximately 15 are fatal, and at least seven result in totaldisability.OSHA believes that the primary cause of non-compliance is the lack of clearregulatory language in Subpart N of 29 CFR Part 1926. In particular, existingandSection; 1926.550(b)(2) provides no direct regulatory guidance. It simplyincorporates ANSI B30.5-1968 by reference. Therefore, under the currentregulations, employers are expected to obtain and read an ANSI documentwhich, as stated above, has been superseded, and determine from it theprocedures for personnel hoisting. In view of this situation, it is easyto see why, despite OSHA's adoption of the ANSI ban on riding the load,so many employees continue to ride the load and are killed or injured eachyear while doing so. Because of this problem of outdated ANSI Standards,OSHA has avoided the use of incorporation by reference whenever possiblein recent years, and has attempted to include all relevant provisions withinthe regulatory text.The text of the current directive, the proposed rule and the final ruleare very similar. OSHA has found, however, that many employers are unawareof or simply do not follow the interpretations and guidelines in OSHA'sdirective on andSection; 1926.550(b). Therefore, in order to protect employeeswho must be hoisted on personnel platforms, the Agency is promulgatingthis standard to eliminate any uncertainty about what is required. OSHAexpects that employers will comply with the requirements of paragraph (g)of andSection; 1926.550, and that compliance will prevent most of the fatalitiesand injuries which have been experienced under the existing standard. Inaddition, OSHA anticipates that compliance with this new standard willreduce the number of injuries and fatalities among employees who mightotherwise be assigned to construct, use, and disassemble scaffolds, orother ``conventional'' means of access, in workplace situations which wouldexpose these employees to greater hazards than would be involved with theuse of crane or derrick suspended platforms.OSHA has determined, through its regulatory impact analysis, that the numberof employees exposed to the hazards of personnel hoisting is relativelysmall. However, the injuries which can result from accidents occurringduring personnel hoisting are usually very severe. A review of some hoistingaccidents illustrates the magnitude of the danger to which employees areexposed.An accident in Cheyenne, Wyoming (1973) resulted in two deaths when a telescopingboom severed the load line. Those deaths would have been averted if theemployees in the platform had been wearing safety belts and lanyards attachedto a lifeline secured to the boom tip, or if the crane had been equippedwith a positive acting anti-two-blocking device. The operator, while experiencedin operating cranes, was not familiar with the specific machine being used,nor with the hoisting operation during which the accident occurred. OSHAhas found that even crane operators who are well acquainted with telescopingboom cranes have had problems when working with this equipment in new locationsand in unfamiliar surroundings.In Kansas City (1972), a structural framework carrying five men and a significantamount of material and equipment fell to the ground when an outrigger ofthe crane failed. The total weight was reported to be only have the ratedcapacity of the crane when boomed out to the work location, but the outriggerbroke loose from its mounting and the boom collapsed before it reachedthe intended radius. Failures of this nature point out the need for exactknowledge of crane or derrick stability, and the need for careful inspectionand testing of such machinery prior to its use for hoisting employees.In Chicago (1981), five employees were killed and a sixth employee wasseriously injured when a job-built personnel basket fell 100 feet. Theemployees were being hoisted by a mobile crane to a work station atop atower crane being assembled on the site. The metal framework at the topof the cage, to which the hoisting rope was attached, separated, causingthe platform and its occupants to fall. The implementation of the specificdesign criteria and inspection and testing requirements in the final ruleshould prevent such accidents caused by structural failure.In Tampa, Florida (1983), four men on a personnel platform were killedin an accident at Tampa Stadium when they were being raised by a craneto a work station 135 feet above the ground at the top of the stadium.When the platform reached 130 feet, the boom of the crane fell and themen in the platform fell with it. The Agency believes the implementationof inspection and testing requirements should prevent these types of accidents.OSHA has carefully developed and reviewed the record for this rulemakingto ensure that the standard, as promulgated, is based on substantial evidence.OSHA has determined, based on the record, that crane and derrick personnelhoisting poses significant risks for affected employees, even when employerscomply with the final rule, and, therefore, prohibits personnel hoistingexcept where there is no feasible safe alternative. The new provisionsin paragraph (g) of andSection; 1926.550 provide criteria for equipment andwork practices that will enable those employers who have no safe alternativemeans of transporting employees to or supporting them at their workplace,to hoist personnel as safely as possible.OSHA has determined that personnel hoisting operations for which thereis no safe alternative and which comply with paragraph (g) will protectworkers from the kind of accidents that resulted in most of the fatalitiesand crippling injuries which occurred under the existing crane and derrickregulations; from most of the fatalities and injuries which occurred whenemployees in- appropriately used scaffolds or other ``conventional'' meansof access; and from virtually all of the fatalities and injuries whichhave occurred when employees rode the hook or load. The Agency believesthat although compliance with these regulations will lessen the potentialfor fatalities and serious injuries, it will not totally eliminate accidentsrelated to the use of crane or derrick suspended personnel platforms. TheAgency concludes that this type of operation is inherently dangerous andmust only be used as a last resort. OSHA notes that three states (Maryland,Washington and California) with stringent personnel platform regulationswere reported by JACA (Ex. 5-2, p. 4-13) as having had no personnel platformaccidents for at least five years. While the Agency believes this sampleis too small to represent or predict national experience, OSHA observesthat the three state standards in question would tend to minimize accidentsbecause of the tight limits on the circumstances where personnel platformsmay be used.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary and Explanation of the Final Rule</ITAG>OSHA requested comments on ten specific issues in the preamble of the proposedstandard (49 FR 6282-6284). All these issues are addressed in conjunctionwith the appropriate provisions of this final rule.Paragraph (g)(1) presents the scope and application of the final rule.OSHA identified this subject as a matter of special concern in Issue 1in the preamble of the proposal. This paragraph has been revised extensivelyin order to simplify the language and clarify OSHA's regulatory intent.Several changes were made in response to public comment or as clarifications,as discussed below.As a matter of clarification, the Agency has revised this provision toindicate that paragraph (g) covers not only the hoisting of the personnelplatform, but the design, construction, testing, use and maintenance ofthe personnel platform as well. OSHA recognizes that several paragraphsof this final rule do, indeed, regulate other matters related to personnelplatforms and that this was not explicitly stated in the proposed rule.Additionally, OSHA has added a definitions section to paragraph (g)(1)which incorporates some of the definitions which were provided as ``Notes''in the proposal. Other definitions in this paragraph are new and reflectchanges in terminology which OSHA feels will most clearly express its regulatoryintent. Finally, some notes which functioned as definitions in the proposedrule have been incorporated directly into the affected provisions. Thisreformatting reflects OSHA's recognition that the definition of terms usedin the standard is more appropriately placed within the text of the regulationinstead of in explanatory notes, and will provide clearer guidance to employers.In its proposal, OSHA presented a list of cranes which it believed mightbe used for personnel hoisting. OSHA received many comments, like thatof the Granite Construction Company (Ex. 3-50), which stated that the listingof particular machines in proposed paragraph (g)(1) was unnecessarily lengthyand machine-specific. Indeed, several commenters pointed out that, by beingso specific, OSHA could create loopholes for specific cranes not listed.For example, the State of California (Ex. 3-33) asserted that OSHA's proposedlanguage did not cover electric cranes, such as hammerhead-type tower cranes.In addition, Unit Crane andamp; Shovel Corporation (Unit Crane) (Ex. 3-47)listed five cranes not mentioned in the proposed rule and recommended thatthe rule cover all cranes which could be used for personnel hoisting. UnitCrane also recommended that the proposed specification of ``friction orhydraulic'' be replaced by the word ``all.'' The Associated General Contractorsof America (AGC), in turn, testified (Tr. 164) that ``Reference to specifictypes of equipment will result in overly broad coverage which * * * willregulate operations outside of those areas of concern. The AGC, therefore,``recommends that the standard apply only to the hoisting of personnelplatforms on the load line of cranes and derricks.''The list of cranes and derricks was intended to illustrate what types ofequipment are covered, rather than to limit the scope of the standard.OSHA recognizes that the list gave a misleading impression of the intendedscope and that the scope can be set forth without using a list. Therefore,based on the comments received, OSHA has revised paragraph (g)(1) to coverall cranes and derricks used to hoist personnel platforms.OSHA received comments from Ingersoll-Rand Company (Ex. 3-18) which suggestedthat the use of derricks for hoisting personnel be prohibited. Ingersoll-Randasserted that derrick hoisting was more likely than crane hoisting to resultin accidents, even if derrick operators complied with the draft revisionof ANSI B30.6-1982, because derricks are material handling devices whichdo not incorporate the safety devices needed for personnel hoisting. Furthermore,the commenter noted that derricks are usually designed and assembled atthe jobsite, and that safe alternatives are available. On the other hand,the National Constructors Association and DuPont (Exs. 3-74 and 3-75) statedthat derrick hoisting which complies with the existing derrick standardsand with the requirements of this standard will not expose hoisted employeesto an unreasonable risk, because derricks, though temporary structures,are more stable than mobile cranes and because derricks are available withthe same safety devices which would be required for cranes.OSHA has determined, upon review of the record, that derricks can complywith the provisions of this standard; that there are circumstances, suchas during the painting of a water tower (Tr. 554), where there is no safealternative to the use of a derrick to hoist personnel; and that derrickhoisting in compliance with this standard does not pose a greater dangerthan crane hoisting. Therefore, OSHA has retained derricks within the scopeof paragraph (g), as proposed.OSHA has deleted the second and third sentences of proposed paragraph (g)(1)because the Agency has determined that they do not deal with the scopeand application, and because they add nothing to the requirements of thestandard. These sentences merely pointed out that the requirements of thisparagraph must be met before hoisting personnel, and that paragraph (g)(2)specifies when this practice is permitted.The Magma Copper Company and National Constructors Association (Exs. 3-27and 3-30) suggested that the definition of ``hoisting,'' which appearedas a note to proposed paragraph (g)(1), be revised to cover explicitlybooming up or down; extending the boom; swinging; and positioning, so thatthe term would more fully cover the circumstances encountered during personnelhoisting.OSHA's intent has been to establish a single term, ``hoisting,'' whichcould be applied to all operations covered by paragraph (g). Therefore,OSHA has made the suggested change in order to state clearly the meaningof the term ``hoisting.''Paragraph (g)(2) of this final rule sets forth OSHA's general policy regardingthe use of cranes or derricks to hoist personnel platforms. In proposedparagraph (g)(2), OSHA ``permitted'' the use of cranes or derrick to hoistpersonnel when that use was ``as safe as the erection, use or dismantlingof conventional means of reaching the worksite * * * ''. OSHA has modifiedproposed paragraph (g)(2) so it clearly states OSHA's recognition thatcranes and derricks are not manufactured for use as personnel hoists. Inparticular, paragraph (g)(2) of the final rule states that personnel hoistingis ``prohibited,'' subject to exceptions based on necessity. The AGC (Ex.3-28 and Tr. 164) and Granite Construction (Ex. 3-50), suggested that OSHApermit crane or derrick hoisting ``where the use of other conventionalmeans of reaching the worksite is more hazardous or is not practical becauseof structural design and worksite conditions.'' In addition, Johnson BrothersCorporation and Gulf Oil Corporation (Exs. 3-43 and 3-68) stated that OSHAshould concern itself with ensuring that the appropriate equipment andprocedures are used, rather than with limiting circumstances where cranesor derricks may be used for personnel hoisting. Furthermore, OrganizationResource Counselors, Inc. (Ex. 3-89) commented that, given the ``difficult,if not impossible, task of determining the safest way to perform work,employers will continue to base their decision to use personnel platformson many considerations, not just safety.'' As stated above, OSHA has determinedthat, given the significant risk posed by personnel hoisting, concern foremployee safety is the only justification for the practice. Therefore,the Agency will consider personnel hoisting conducted for reasons of practicalityor convenience alone, to violate this standard. As discussed above, theexperience of three states with stringent personnel platform standardsindicates that setting such narrow limits on the circumstances under whichpersonnel platforms may be used will minimize personnel platform accidents.Several commenters, including the Frey andamp; Egle Company and the UnitedSteelworkers of America (Exs. 3-7 and 3-10) objected to the use of cranesor derricks for personnel hoisting under any circumstances. They statedthat personnel hoisting is inherently dangerous and noted that cranes andderricks are not designed or manufactured for personnel hoisting. In addition,the Farm and Industrial Equipment Institute [FIEI] (Ex. 3-37) commentedthat using a boom-mounted bucket is always safer than using a suspendedpersonnel platform. National Crane Services (Ex. 3-71), while disagreeingwith the FIEI contention that boom-mounted baskets are always safer thancrane-hoisted platforms, supported harrowly liniting personnel hoistingbecause cranes are not designed to hoist personnel and because crane hoistingrequires more skill and process control than material hoisting.OSHA recognizes the seriousness of these concerns. In addition, the Agencyhas received written comments (Ex. 3-7) and public hearing testimony (Tr.58-163) from Frey andamp; Egle which states that its product, the Crane AirBridge (CAB), hoists personnel for all the purposes where employers mightuse cranes or derricks without exposing employees to the hazards associatedwith crane or derrick hoisting.OSHA, however, is concerned that the CAB has not been extensively marketedor operated in the United States. OSHA also notes that there is inadequateinformation in the record to determine if the CAB could satisfactorilyreplace crane and derrick personnel hoisting equipment totally, now orin the future. Additionally, due to the lack of information, the Agencyis unable to determine whether the CAB can be considered a conventionalmeans of access under andSection; 1926.556, Aerial Lifts, or under andSection;1926.451(f) Elevating and Rotating Work Platforms. That determination willdepend upon compliance with ANSI A92.2-1969, Vehicle Mounted Elevatingand Rotating Workplatforms, required by both andSection;andSection; 1926.556and 1926.451(f). Therefore, while the use of the CAB is arguably as safeas or safer than crane or derrick personnel hoisting, OSHA is going forwardwith the promulgation of this standard, pending a future determinationas to whether or not the CAB can indeed provide safe and reliably availablepersonnel positioning.The final rule requires that employers take a hard look at their workplacesituations before deciding how employees will be transported to or maintainedat different elevations. Where conventional means of access, such as scaffolds,ladders and, perhaps ultimately, CAB's are less hazardous, personnel hoistingby crane or derrick will be prohibited. Where conventional means of accesswould not be considered safer, personnel hoisting operations which complywith the terms of this standard would be authorized, only to the limitedextent that the dangers of using conventional means would justify themor to the extent that it is not possible to transport or position employeesusing conventional means. OSHA stresses that employee safety, and not practicalityor convenience, must be the basis for the employer's choice of method.The Construction Industry Manufacturers Association (Ex. 3-31) stated thatOSHA's use of the word ``permitted'' in proposed paragraph (g)(2) seemedto promote rather than limit the use of cranes or derricks to hoist personnel.As has already been discussed, OSHA is limiting, not promoting, crane orderrick personnel hoisting. Therefore, OSHA has revised the language ofparagraph (g)(2) to reflect the Agency's policy more clearly.Also, in paragraph (g)(2), OSHA has added ``personnel hoist'' to the listof conventional means used to reach a worksite. OSHA had intended onlyto provide examples of such means, not an exhaustive list. However, sincea personnel hoist is a commonly used piece of conventional access equipment,OSHA decided that the addition was appropriate.Paragraph (g)(3) presents the requirements for operating and equippingcranes or derricks used to hoist employees.Paragraph (g)(3)(i) presents general operational criteria. OSHA receiveda number of comments regarding the provisions of this paragraph, and hasrevised it to reflect commenter input as discussed below.In proposed paragraph (g)(3)(i)(A), OSHA required that hoisting speed notexceed 100 feet per minute. This proposed requirement was based on ANSIB30.5-1982 and recommendations from ACCSH in 1974 and 1983, and reflectedthe recognition that employee hoisting requires even greater caution andmargin of safety than material hoisting. In particular, OSHA was concernedthat hoisted personnel or their platforms could be tipped or dropped ifhoist speed outstripped the operator's ability to maneuver safely. TheAgency believes that those dangers would be especially great when a hoistoperation is beginning or ending.OSHA observed, in its discussion of the proposed provision and in Issue5, that there were questions regarding the feasibility of and need fora specific speed limit, and for a device to indicate the line speed tothe operator. In light of these questions, OSHA did not propose to requirethat cranes used to hoist personnel be equipped with line speed indicators.The Agency noted that ACCSH in 1974 viewed line speed indicators as eitherinfeasible or unnecessary. In addition, OSHA cited a draft revision ofANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(a)(13), (Ex. 2-14) under which the 100foot per minute limit would have been changed to a requirement ``that movementof the work platform with personnel shall be done in a slow, controlled,cautious manner with no sudden movements of the crane or work platform.''(49 FR 6285). OSHA also noted that Grove Crane (Ex. 2-17) included a 100foot per minute limit in the specifications for the use of its cranes tohoist personnel. As with ANSI and ACCSH, Grove did not suggest specificmeans by which operators could determine if they were operating withinthe 100 feet per minute limit.OSHA received a number of comments on this proposed paragraph. The TennesseeRoad Builders Association and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico (Exs. 3-41and 3-55) expressed support for the provision as proposed, with PuertoRico suggesting that employers following the draft revision of ANSI B30.5use 100 feet per minute as the upper limit of ``slow,'' even if ANSI revisedit standard to require ``caution'' instead of a set limit. On the otherhand, Bechtel Corporation (Ex. 3-45) commented that the proposed limitwas overly conservative because crane manufacturers' technical specificationsfor personnel hoisting showed speeds between 150 and 300 feet per minute,and because a requirement that the hoist speed be ``reasonable for theconditions'' would provide adequate protection. In addition, the StandardOil Company (Indiana) (Ex 3-46) emphasized that it is the rate of accelerationor deceleration, not the speed, itself, that was the primary safety concern.Also, the T.A. Loving Company (Ex. 3-82) and the AGC of America (Tr. 191-192)suggested that OSHA not require a line speed indicator because watchingit would distract the operator from watching the platform and thus increasethe risk of two-blocking. Most of the comments received on this proposed provision, such as thosefrom the State of California, the Boeing Company and the Panama Canal Commission(Exs. 3-33, 3-38 and 3-51) supported wording similar to that in the draftrevision of ANSI B30.5, section 5-3.2.2(a)(13). ANSI retained the 100 foot per minute speed limit when it revised B30.5.OSHA has determined, however, based on its review of the record, that requiring``slow, cautious and controlled'' hoisting will provide hoisted personnelwith better protection than would a 100 foot per minute limit. In the course of this rulemaking, OSHA has determined that line speed indicatorscapable of measuring a speed as slow as 100 feet per minute are not readilyavailable for many cranes. Additionally, OSHA agrees with comments thatthe operator's attention should be directed to the platform during a lift,and not to a line speed indicator. Also, OSHA agrees with Standard Oilthat line speed indicators are not needed on cranes or derrick hoistingpersonnel because the rate of acceleration or deceleration is more importantthan the line speed itself in determining the safety of hoisting operations.OSHA notes that the size of the crane or derrick hoist drum and the heightof the lift are important considerations in determining what is ``slow.''For example, when using a crane with a large hoist drum for personnel liftsof several hundred feet, OSHA believes that hoisting at 100 feet per minuteis unnecessarily slow. On the other hand, when using cranes with smallhoist drums, a rate of 100 feet per minute or less may be necessary forproper control of the platform. As a point of reference, OSHA notes that100 feet per minute is equivalent to a very slow walk. Site conditionsalso are important in deciding what rate is safe for a particular lift.Furthermore, a limit on the number of feet a platform can travel in a minutewill not protect employees unless the crane or derrick operator otherwiseexercises caution while hoisting. Finally, OSHA believes that requiring``slow, cautious and controlled'' hoisting will ensure that the operatorpays attention to the location of the platform during the lift, the rateof acceleration and deceleration, and the rate of ascent or descent. OSHA,therefore, agrees with the commenters who suggest that the Agency require``slow, cautious and controlled'' hoisting as the appropriate means ofprotecting hoisted employees from sudden pitching of the crane or platform.Accordingly, OSHA is issuing paragraph (g)(3)(i)(A) as revised. In Issue 5 of the proposed rule, OSHA also asked for comments and informationon the need for load line position indicators. The commenters who respondedto this Issue (Exs. 3-9, 3-14, 3-22, 3-30, 3-33 and 3-47) generally statedthat the position indicator would be an unnecessary burden because therequirement in proposed paragraph (g)(6)(viii) for continuous sight andcommunication would protect hoisted employees. The State of California(Ex. 3-33) also stated that specifications for use and maintenance raisedconcerns. OSHA has determined, based on the record, that the requirementsfor continuous sight and communication in paragraph (g)(6)(vi) of the finalrule make a requirement for a loadline position indicator unnecessary.Paragraph (g)(3)(i)(B) sets forth the safety factors for load hoist wireropes on cranes or derricks used to hoist personnel. The proposed paragraphsimply stated that the minimum hoist load safety factor would be seven.It became clear to OSHA from commenter responses that the proposal didnot indicate clearly how the safety factor for hoisting personnel comparedto the safety factor already required for materials hoisting in andSection;1926.550. The Agency also determined employers need additional informationin the standard to determine if their operations comply with the standard.Therefore, the Agency has revised this paragraph to state clearly the requiredstrength of wire rope used to hoist personnel. OSHA has also added definitions for ``failure,'' ``load refusal,'' and``maximum intended load'' in paragraph (g)(1)(ii) in order to state clearlythe usage of those terms in the final rule. Additionally, OSHA has addedan explanation of how employers are to comply with this requirement.Section 1926.32(m) defines ``safety factor'' as ``the ratio of the ultimatebreaking strength of a member or piece of material or equipment to theactual work stress or safe load when in use.'' Under existing OSHA regulations, andSection; 1926.550 (b) and (e), whichincorporate ANSI B30.5-1968 (cranes) and B30.6-1969 (derricks) by reference,wire ropes used to hoist material must have a minimum safety factor of3.5. OSHA has determined, based in part on information from the ACCSH,and ANSI B30.5 Committee and the ``Rigging Manual'' published by the ConstructionSafety Association of Ontario, Canada, that a wire rope safety factor of3.5, alone, is inadequate to protect hoisted personnel from hoisting riskssuch as the severing of the load line. The ACCSH recommended that the safetyfactor be eight, while a draft revision of ANSI B30.5, section 5-3.2.2.3(a)(5)recommended a safety factor of eight for rotation resistant rope, and fivefor other wire rope. The draft revision was not adopted by ANSI as a nationalconsensus standard. The Canadian ``Rigging Manual'' specifies 10 as theminimum wire rope safety factor for personnel hoisting. OSHA did not propose any of the suggested safety factors in paragraph (g)(3)(i)(B).Instead, OSHA determined that the necessary employee protection could beachieved by keeping the existing 3.5 safety factor requirement and deratingthe capacity of a crane or derrick by 50 percent, which would effectivelydouble the safety factor to seven. The proposed safety factor, seven, wasintended as an adequate and easy to calculate upgrade in the protectionprovided by wire ropes used for personnel hoisting. In Issue 4 of the proposal, OSHA discussed the above-mentioned safety factorsand explained how the requirements of proposed paragraph (g)(3)(i)(B) andthe 50 percent derating required in paragraph (g)(3)(i)(F) are intendedto provide the safety factor of seven. OSHA also requested input regardingthe adequacy of the proposed regulatory approach and regarding the needfor a different safety factor for rotation resistant wire rope. The lattertopic reflected OSHA's concern that while rotation resistant rope reducesplatform swaying and spinning, it is also subject to internal, often undetectable,damage. Ebasco Constructors, Inc. (Ex. 3-6), the National Constructors Association(Ex. 3-30) and Organization Resource Counselors (Exs. 3-89) suggested thatOSHA simply refer employers to the manufacturers' specifications for theircranes or derricks and apply the derating provisions of proposed paragraph(g)(3)(i)(B) without setting a separate safety factor provision. Ebasco,in particular, stated that OSHA would confuse compliance efforts if itpromulgated both as 50 percent derating and a safety factor, because employersmight conclude that they were required both to use wire ropes with a safetyfactor of seven and to derate capacity by 50 percent. Indeed, the Commonwealthof Puerto Rico (Ex. 3-55) apparently drew that conclusion, as reflectedby its comments which favored the proposed safety factor of seven becausethe 50 percent derating would raise the safety factor to 14. On the other hand, some commenters, such as Unit Crane, Dupont, and UnionWire Rope (Exs. 3-47, 3-75 and 3-22), stated that the proposed deratingsalone would not raise the wire rope safety factors to the extent predictedby OSHA. Those commenters noted that variations in a crane or derrick boomangle, boom weight, or rigging configuration would determine the extentto which derating increased the safety factor. Indeed, Unit Crane observedthat, if the boom weighed 20,000 pounds and the rated load was 5,000 pounds,derating by 50 percent would reduce the suspension system load by only10 percent. Dupont, however, noted that rerating capacity by 50 percentwould provide a ``generous'' addition margin of safety for personnel hoistingoperations, as long as the minimum boom angle was at least 40 degrees.Another commenter, the United Steelworkers of America (Ex. 3-10), suggestedthat OSHA require employers to make charts available to crane operatorsso that they can quickly and accurately calculate a crane's capacity whenthe crane boom is at a particular angle.Several commenters, such as Magma Copper, Bechtel Corporation and the GraniteConstruction Corp. (Exs. 3-27, 3-45 and 3-50), stated that a safety factorlower than seven would protect workers adequately. Bechtel suggested thatOSHA retain 3.5 as the safety factor, without derating, while Magma Copperand Granite Construction suggested that the safety factor be set at five,as recommended by a draft revision of ANSI B30.5 which was then in circulation.The Salt River Project (Ex. 3-61) specifically opposed raising the wirerope safety factor either to seven or 10. Other commenters, including theWire Rope Safety Board, Kerr-McGee Corporation and Spartan Equipment Company(Exs. 3-15, 3-23 and 3-82), stated that setting the wire rope safety factorat seven would provide adequate protection. In particular, Spartan expressedits understanding that the safety factor of seven would be achieved throughderating. Several commenters, including the Boeing Company, Unit Crane andamp; Shoveland Boeing Aerospace Company (Exs. 3-38, 3-47 and 3-57) suggested thatOSHA set the minimum wire rope safety factor for personnel hoisting at10. In particular, those commenters cited the Canadian ``Rigging Manual''published by the Construction Safety Association to support their position.The Boeing commenters also referenced regulations for powered platforms(29 CFR 1910.66) and consensus standards for personnel hoists (ANSI A10.4).In addition, Unit Crane andamp; Shovel based its recommendation on the PowerCrane and Shovel Association Standard No. 4-1983, the American PetroleumInstitute's API Spec. 2C, Third Edition, March 1983, and the retirementcriteria for wire rope presented in ANSI B30.5-1982. The Boeing Company(Ex. 3-78) later reversed its position regarding wire rope safety factors,suggesting that OSHA raise the safety factors above the levels mandatedfor material hoisting only if OSHA determined, through a review of accidentdata, that hoisting personnel with ropes satisfying the existing safetyfactors poses a significant risk to employees. The commenters differed in their suggestions for the standard wire ropesafety factor but were uniform in their recommendation that OSHA ban orlimit the use of rotation resistant wire rope for personnel hoisting. Manycommenters suggested that OSHA set a higher safety factor for rotationresistant wire rope. Granite Construction specifically invoked ANSI and,in addition, suggested that OSHA prohibit the use of rotation resistantrope for personnel hoisting. Kerr-McGee suggested that employers avoidthe use of rotation resistant rope for personnel hoisting because of problemswith the rate and detection of rope deterioration. The Wire Rope SafetyBoard noted that static tests on rotation resistant rope indicated reductionin breaking strength of up to 50 percent when compared to the same testson non-rotation resistant rope. The Wire Rope Safety Board also observedthat, while the safety factor of seven would provide a reassuring levelof protection, the tendency for rotation resistant rope to break down couldbe important if the rope was burdened at its full breaking strength. Thatsituation could occur in an emergency, such as the snagging of a platformon a projection. Both the Boeing Company and Boeing Aerospace (Exs. 3-38 and 3-57) expressedspecial concern about the use of rotation resistant wire rope for personnelhoisting, because that rope is ``susceptible to internal damage (from overload)that cannot be detected by inspection.'' They noted that wire rope manufacturersrecommended that employers effectively double the safety factors when usingrotation resistant rope. Therefore, they suggested that OSHA set the safetyfactor for rotation resistant wire rope at double that for other hoistingrope. The United Steelworkers of America (USWA) and the Construction IndustryManufacturers Association (CIMA) (Exs. 3-10 and 3-31), suggested that,because of the potential hazards to hoisted personnel, OSHA set the safetyfactor for rotation resistant wire rope at 10, rather than at seven. TheUSWA cited MSHA's proposed regulation for personnel lifts which requiresa 10:1 safety factor for rotation resistant ropes. Also, the CIMA pointedout that, since section 5-1.7.1(c) of ANSI B30.5-1982 requires rotationresistant wire rope to have a minimum design factor of five, setting theminimum safety factor at 10 for personnel hoisting would be consistentwith OSHA's position that halving the rated capacity doubles the safetyfactor. OSHA has determined, based on its review of the record, that requiringa safety factor of seven for running ropes, other than rotation resistantropes, provides adequate protection for hoisted personnel. In particular,the Agency believes that setting the safety factor below seven would notsatisfy OSHA's intention that hoisted personnel receive more protectionthan hoisted material. On the other hand, OSHA has decided that settingthe safety factor at 10 for standard design running rope is not necessaryto protect employees, and would be unnecessarily burdensome, without providinga significant increase in employee safety. In addition, OSHA notes thatcompliance would be more complicated if the Agency set the safety factorat 10 because the simple 50 percent derating approach could not be applied.OSHA believes that using the 50 percent derating is a convenient and easyto use method of providing the required employee protection. OSHA's deliberationsregarding derating are discussed below in more detail under paragraph (g)(3)(i)(F).OSHA has determined, through its review of the numerous comments receivedand other information in the record, that although the minimum safety factorof seven is adequate for standard wire rope, it would not adequately protectemployees being hoisted with rotation resistant wire rope. In particular,OSHA has concluded that rotation resistant rope is more easily damagedand is more difficult to inspect than other wire rope. Section 5-1.7.1of ANSI B30.5-1982, for example, takes those differences into account inthe context of material hoisting, by setting the minimum design factorat 3.5 for live or running ropes and at five for rotation resistant ropes.Therefore, consistent with its calculations for other wire rope, OSHA believesthat derating cranes using rotation resistant wire rope by 50 percent willraise the effective safety factor to 10. The Agency has determined thatthis increase in the safety factor is necessary to protect employees fromthe combined hazards of personnel hoisting and rotation resistant rope.OSHA has chosen to set a separate, higher, safety factor for rotation resistantrope rather than limit or prohibit its use because, when used in compliancewith the provisions of this standard, rotation resistant rope increasesthe crane or derrick operator's control over the movement and positionof a personnel platform during hoisting, and precludes having to changeropes on a crane already using rotation resistant rope that is used tohoist personnel. OSHA has determined that rotation resistant rope whichsatisfies the safety factor of 10 is already used by or readily availableto employers, so this requirement imposes a minimal additional burden.Paragraph (g)(3)(i)(C) requires that all brakes and other locking devicesbe engaged when a personnel platform is in a stationary working position,so that hoisted employees are not exposed to the hazards of cable to slip.The Boeing Company, Boeing Aerospace and Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Exs.3-38, 3-57 and 3-47), were the only commenters on this provision. The Boeingcommenters supported regulatory language which would protect hoisted employeesagainst sudden platform movement during periods when the platform was suspendedat a work position. Unit Crane commented that ``this provision in thisposition is a good one and should be retained.'' United Crane also notedthat this provision, while not part of section 5-3.2.2, Personnel lifting,of ANSI B30.5, was implied by section 5-3.2.1.3(c), ``Holding the load.''In addition, the commenters suggested that OSHA require automatic brakesin order to prevent inadvertent platform movement. This issue is discussedin detail below. Based on the record, OSHA has determined that paragrapah(g)(3)(i)(C) is necessary to protect hoisted employees from the hazardsof being spilled from the platform. Paragraph (g)(3)(i)(D) of the final rule requires that cranes and derricksused to hoist personnel be equipped for and operated with controlled loadlowering. This provision also prohibits free fall. The paragraph is basedon ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(a)(9). Issue 2 specifically requestedadditional comments on this subject. This paragraph is intended to ensurethat employers operate their personnel hoisting equipment so that hoistedpersonnel are not exposed to the hazards of sudden, fast descents. The Agency received many comments on this provision. The Milwaukee ConstructionIndustry Safety Council (MCISC), (Exs. 3-26 and 3-70), for example, assertedthat engineering and economic constraints would prevent all but the largestcontractors from retrofitting their cranes, so the small contractors wouldbe unable to hoist employees. In addition, the Associated General Contructorsof America (AGC) (Ex. 3-28) suggested that such a requirement should bephased in as new equipment is marketed. The AGC joined with the MCISC inrecommending that cranes used for pile driving be exempted from this paragraphbecause ``companies engaged in pile driving cannot operate with power loadlowering'' and those companies ``have to hoist personnel aloft to performpile driving work.'' Therefore, according to the AGC, the proposed requirementwas impracticable for pile driving cranes. Also, the National Associationof Demolition Contractors (NADC) (Ex. 3-8) commented that controlled loadlowering would impede demolition operations which require free fall. TheNADC suggested that the use of oversized brakes and clutches would ensurethe safety of hoisted personnel, because the oversized brakes and clutchescould be engaged to slow descent safely. Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Exs.3-47 and 3-81), on the other hand, asserted that effective field-installedretrofit kets are available at reasonable cost. Unit Crane also observedthat the restrictions on personnel hoisting would mean that relativelyfew cranes with the required equipment would be needed and that contractorscould plan ahead to have a properly equipped crane on hand when needed.Indeed, the vast majority of commenters who addressed this issue agreedthat OSHA should require controlled load lowering features on all craneswhich hoist personnel. These commenters included Northwest EngineeringCompany, the State of Alaska, the U.S. Air Force, Johnson Brothers Corporation,the Farm and Industrial Equipment Institute, the National ConstructionAssociation and the Spartan Equipment Company. (Exs. 3-3, 3-4, 3-24, 3-43,3-47, 3-73, 3-74 and 3-82). The Parsons Corporation (Ex. 3-22) stated that``We agree with OSHA's proposal to require controlled load lowering; infact, we consider such a function as essential. DuPont (Ex. 3-75) tookissue with those commenters who suggested that OSHA exempt cranes usedfor pile driving and demolition from the controlled load lowering requirements,stating that most cranes are available with drum drives that allow operationin free fall or controlled lowering mode and that the cost of retrofittingis reasonable. In addition, Northwest Engineering Company (Ex. 3-3) notedthat, while it may be impractical to retrofit old cranes, there are enoughproperly equipped cranes which could be borrowed or rented to hoist employeessafely. OSHA has determined that a controlled load lowering requirement will effectivelyprotect hoisted employees from sudden stops, starts and free fall, withoutunduly burdening employers. Although they can help stop a fall once ithas begun, oversized brakes or clutches will not themselves prevent precipitousfree fall. OSHA is also concerned that without controlled load lowering,the use of oversize brakes to stop free fall would jolt the platform, possiblythrowing employees off. As documented by JACA, OSHA's contractor for thisrulemaking (Ex. 5-2, Appendix C) many employees have been killed or injuredin accidents which would have been prevented by the use of controlled loadlowering. Therefore, OSHA has decided, based on the evidence in the record,to promulgate paragraph (g)(3)(i)(D) as proposed, except that the explanatorynote in the proposed provision has been incorporated into the standarditself.In addition, Issue 7 requested information on the need for an automaticbrake which stops the load when the operator releases the controls. Thecomments received indicated that opinions on automatic brakes (also referredto as ``deadman brakes'') intertwined with views on the proposed controlledload lowering requirement. Thus, commenters, such as the AGC of America(Exs. 3-28 and 3-67), and the National Constructors Association mixed theirstatements of opposition to automatic brakes with assertions that freefall was necessary. Commenters such as Dupont, Spartan Equipment, and OrganizationResource Counselors (Exs. 3-75, 3-82 and 3-89) stated that an automaticbrake requirement would pose great expense and difficulty for users ofmechanical clutch-drive cranes (i.e., cranes which do not have controlledload lowering). On the other hand, Puerto Rico and Boeing Aerospace (Exs.3-55 and 3-57) stated that automatic brakes were needed to prevent free-fall,and the Construction Safety Association of Ontario (Ex. 3-81) stated thatinexpensive automatic brake retrofit kits were readily available.OSHA has determined, based on its review of the record on Issue 7, thatthe benefits of an automatic brake requirement will be gained through thepromulgation of the proposed controlled load lowering and, in part, anti-twoblocking requirements, because the equipment and procedures necessary toprevent free fall or two-blocking will approximate those envisioned foran automatic brake. Therefore, OSHA has decided not to promulgate a separaterequirement for an automatic brake.Paragraph (g)(3)(i)(E) requires that cranes used to hoist personnel beuniformly level within one percent of level grade and located on firm footing.In addition, cranes equipped with outriggers shall have all of them deployed,according to manufacturer's specifications, when personnel are to be hoisted.This language is essentially identical to that in the proposed requirement.This requirement, based on ANSI B30.5-1968, section 5-1.2, B30.5-1982,sections 5-1.2.2(e) and 5-3.2.1.4(a)(1), and the specifications providedby manufacturers such as Grove (Ex. 2-17), requires that the crane be ``level.''The Agency notes that B30.5-1968 as referenced in andSection; 1926.550(b)(2),sets the requirements for compliance with the existing standard. OSHA isaware that a crane loses between five and 30 percent of its capacity whenit deviates from level by as little as one degree. Indeed, capacity chartsgenerally are based on the assumption that hoisting cranes are within onepercent of level. Also, OSHA is aware that most cranes used to hoist personnelare ``free-swinging,'' so that the boom of a crane which is not level willswing around to the ``low spot.'' Based on those considerations and theAgency's concern about the tipping hazards to which hoisted employees areexposed, OSHA has determined that limiting deviation to within one percentof level will provide operators with reliable capacity information andoverall stability.Some of the commenters, such as the Carolinas Branch of the AGC and theT.A. Loving Company (Exs. 3-39 and 3-82), stated that it was impossibleto operate a crane uniformly level within one percent of level grade becausemovement of certain crane components causes one percent deviation, evenwhen no load is hoisted. OSHA observes that the proposed provision coversthe placement of the crane, not the operation. Even so, the Agency hasdetermined that the operation of a crane on a surface which has been properlyleveled will not result in deviation beyond one percent of level grade.Therefore, OSHA notes the importance of choosing the appropriate set uplocation and leveling materials and procedures to ensure that deviationdoes not exceed one percent. Also, the Equitable Gas Company (Ex. 3-25)stated that requiring mobile cranes to be leveled within one percent oflevel grade would defeat the design of the rear tires, which are designedto be load bearing under certain conditions. OSHA notes that mobile cranesequipped with outriggers are often required to deploy all outriggers, andthat the leveling of the crane is accomplished by use of the outriggers,so that the tires are not load bearing during hoisting operations.The AGC of America (Ex. 3-28 and Tr. 165, 197), suggested that a craneoperating within three percent of level grade would be safe. Another commenter,Granite Construction (Ex. 3-50), suggested that mobile cranes equippedwith outriggers can readily satisfy the proposed one percent limit, whilecrawler cranes, which are not so equipped, should only have to operatewithin three percent of level grade because it would be too difficult forthe crawler cranes to achieve one percent.The Agency agrees that providing a level grade for a crane without outriggersmay be more difficult. OSHA has determined, however, based on the record,that all cranes can be leveled within one percent of grade and that theadditional effort required to do so is not an unreasonable burden. TheAgency reiterates that employee safety, not the employer's convenience,controls the setting of requirements for personnel hoisting.Several commenters, such as the State of Maryland, the Construction IndustryManufacturer's Association (CIMA), the Boeing Company and Boeing Aerospace(Exs. 3-19, 3-31, 3-38 and 3-57), expressed support for the one percentlimit.In particular, the CIMA stated that ``the correct level is critical tothe safe operation of the crane,'' especially because, as stated above,the load charts only apply when the crane is level. CIMA suggested thatthe one percent limit be measured as one foot of rise for one hundred feetof run.The State of Maryland (Ex. 3-19) suggested that OSHA revise this paragraphto specify that <T3>all</T3> outriggers on a given crane be deployed because otherwiseemployers could interpret the provision as not requiring that all outriggersbe used. The danger is that deploying only some of the outriggers couldpermit the crane to tip out of balance as the boom swings, as documentedby JACA, OSHA's contractor for this rulemaking (Ex. 5-2, Case No. P-6).Since some manufacturers do not specify that <T3>all</T3> outriggers must be used, OSHA is requiring that, in the absenceof applicable manufacturer instructions, all outriggers be fully extendedand positioned.OSHA believes that the crane leveling requirement, as clarified, providesthe necessary protection for hoisted employees, while taking into accountthe deviation from level for which crane load charts make allowance. OSHAhas concluded that allowing greater leeway for deviation from level woulddangerously reduce the reliability of the load charts and increase thelikelihood of the crane tipping over. Therefore, OSHA promulgates thisparagraph, as revised.Paragraph (g)(3)(i)(F) requires a 50 percent derating of a crane used tohoist personnel, so that the crane would be authorized to lift no morethan half the load it could lift if it were hoisting materials. This provisionis based on section 5-3.2.2(a)(17) of ANSI B30.5-1982. Parsons Corporation(Ex. 3-22) and the National Constructors Association (Ex. 3-74), amongothers, supported the proposed derating, focusing on the ease of applyinga provision which simply requires the crane operator to divide the referencedload chart figure by two, and on the attendant safety benefit. UniversalWire Rope Products (Ex. 3-36) and DuPont (Ex. 3-75) supported the derating,but noted that achieving the advantages of derating depended on carefullycontrolling boom angle. Other commenters, such as the United Steelworkersof America (Ex. 3-10) and the Organization Resources Counselors (Ex. 3-89),emphasized the need to provide crane operators with charts so they couldcalculate the crane's capacity at different boom angles.The National Association of Demolition Contractors (NADC) (Ex. 3-8) andUnit Crane andamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47) recommended the cranes be derated to25 percent, with Unit Crane considering derating to 33 percent adequatefor some cranes. NADC apparently viewed derating as a substitute for controlledload lowering and other paragraph (g)(3) requirements. Unit Crane, in turn,based its recommendation on the American Petroleum Institute's Specification2C, March 1982, which addresses tipping hazards.OSHA received comments from the Associated General Contractors of St. Louis(Ex. 3-14), the Carolinas Branch of the AGC, (Exs. 3-39 and 3-82), Bechtel(Ex. 3-45) and the State of Michigan (Ex. 3-84) which challenged the needfor the proposed derating. Those commenters generally stated that existingsafeguards were adequate or that the anticipated platform load was toolow compared to the rating of the crane to justify derating. The AGC ofAmerica (Ex. 3-28 and Tr. 199) and Granite Construction (Ex. 3-50) assertedthat existing and proposed safety requirements made it unnecessary to deratebelow 75 percent of rated capacity.OSHA notes that load rating charts are already required by existing andSection;1926.550(a)(2). OSHA also notes that the commenters who opposed deratingand other proposed criteria generally did not distinguish between the safeguardsconsidered adequate for hoisting material and those necessary for hoistingpersonnel. OSHA has determined that personnel hoisting, insofar as it isallowed, requires a higher degree of caution and a greater margin of safetythan is required for material hoisting because the potential for employeeinjury in a personnel hoisting accident is far greater. OSHA agrees withthe commenters who stress that the 50 per cent derating is both protectiveand easy to apply, increasing the assurance that crane operators will calculatecorrectly the load limits and safely hoist personnel platforms. OSHA hasno basis for concluding that setting the derating requirement at some otherpercentage would provide more safety. Indeed, the Agency is concerned thatsetting a different derating percentage would increase the likelihood thatthe operator would miscalculate the load limit, possibly causing an accident.Therefore, based on the evidence in the record, OSHA is promulgating paragraph(g)(3)(i)(F) as proposed.Paragraph (g)(3)(i)(G) prohibits employers from hoisting personnel usingcranes or derricks with live booms. This provision is based on ANSI A10.28-1983,``Work Platforms Suspended from Cranes or Derricks_Safety Requirements,''section 3.1 ANSI A10.28 defines a live boom as one whose lowering is controlledby brakes without aid from other devices. OSHA agrees with ANSI that theuse of live booms would endanger hoisted employees.The agency received comments on this provision from the Carolinas Branchof the AGC (Ex. 3-39 and 3-82) and the Tennessee Roadbuilders Association(Ex. 3-41), requesting that OSHA add an exemption for ``life or death emergencies.''OSHA understands that during a ``life or death emergency'' people willdo what is necessary, using whatever equipment is available to preventdeath or injury. Therefore, this provision is promulgated as proposed,except that the explanatory note in the proposal has been incorporatedinto the standard.Paragraph (g)(3)(ii) requires that cranes or derricks used to hoist personnelbe equipped with certain operational aids in order to prevent tipping,two-blocking or other accidents. OSHA specifically requested additionalinput in this subject in Issue 5.Proposed paragraph (g)(3)(ii)(A) required employers to equip those cranesand derricks having variable angle booms with boom angle indicators whichare readily visible to the operator. This provision is based on ANSI B30.5-1982,section 5-1.9.1(c). The Agency received comments from Unit Crane andamp;Shovel (Ex. 3-47) and Puerto Rico (Ex. 3-55) which supported this requirementas proposed. The State of California, the Boeing Company and Boeing Aerospace(Exs. 3-33, 3-38 and 3-57) supported the proposed requirements and suggestedthat the Agency also require a radius chart. That suggestion has not beenadopted because the necessary data is incorporated in the load chart whichis already required by andSection; 1926.550(a)(2) of the construction standards.As proposed, paragraph (g)(3)(ii)(A) appeared to require that cranes beequipped with boom angle indicators, whether or not they had variable anglebooms. Therefore, in promulgating the final rule, OSHA has rephrased paragraph(g)(3)(ii)(A) to make it clear that only cranes and derricks equipped withvariable angle booms and used to hoist personnel must have boom angle indicators.Proposed paragraph (g)(3)(ii)(B) required employers to equip or mark anytelescoping boom so that the extended length is clearly indicated. Thisprovision is based on ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-1.9.1(e). However, commenterssuch as the Daniel Construction Company and the Carolinas Branch of theAGC (Exs. 3-17 and 3-39), indicated that the marking would be ineffectivebecause the marking would not be visible to the crane operator at the controls.Another commenter, the Al Johnson Construction Company (Ex. 3-42), assertedthat effective instruments are not available, and that compliance withparagraph (g)(6)(vi), which requires continuous contact between the operatoror signal person and the platform occupants, will provide the operatorwith the information necessary to hoist employees safely. On the otherhand, Wylie Systems presented testimony at the public hearings (Tr. 472-73,489-90) and the PAT Equipment Corporation submitted information (Ex. 7-E)which indicated that effective instrumentation is available. Standard Oil (Indiana) (Ex. 3-46) commented that ``Safe work practice requiresthat a crane operator knows the load weight, load radius and height oflift prior to actually making the lift.'' Using that information, the operatorcould refer to the crane's range diagram to determine the required boomlength without reference to length markings or indicators. OSHA has determined that there are effective boom length indicators readilyavailable for installation on telescoping booms. In addition, the Agencybelieves that markings on the boom can provide the operator with boom lengthinformation. OSHA also agrees with Standard Oil (Indiana) that an operatorpreparing to hoist personnel could determine the boom length without usinga boom length indicator. Therefore, OSHA has revised proposed paragraph(g)(3)(ii)(B) so that, as promulgated, it permits operators, as an alternativeto using the required markings or indicators, to determine the anticipatedload radius accurately and use that finding to calculate the necessaryboom length. Paragraph (g)(3)(ii)(C) of this final rule requires the use of an anti-two-blockingdevice, or a two-block damage prevention feature on cranes or derricksused to hoist personnel. These devices are intended to prevent the boomtip from contacting the load block or overhaul ball and severing the hoistrope. Anti-two-blocking devices detect that the overhaul ball has comeclose to the boom tip and activate a brake which immediately stops thehoist and holds the platform in place. This provision is based, in part,on ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2, which states that employers shallhave warning or other limiting devices ``to prevent two-blocking, unlessaudible communications have been provided and one of the persons beinglifted has been specifically assigned'' to warn against two-blocking hazards.OSHA did not adopt this approach in the proposed rule. The Agency, however,did request (49 FR 6285) that commenters inform OSHA of any conditionswhere the use of warning devices would be more feasible than the use ofpositive acting mechanisms. OSHA received a great volume of comment on this provision, most of it opposingthe requirement or urging that OSHA require something less than the proposedpositive acting preventive devices. For example, Longview Fibre Company,Columbia Nitrogen Corporation and the AGC of California (Exs. 3-52, 3-58and 3-66) asserted that available anti-two-blocking equipment does notwork properly and that careful operation of a crane would obviate the needfor installation of anti-two-block controls. In addition, Dupont (Ex. 3-75)stated that the kind of automatic brake needed to prevent two-blockinghas not yet been developed to the point where it could be considered ``areliable safety component.'' Therefore, Dupont along with other commenters,such as the Pennzoil Company (Ex. 3-29), Boeing Company (Ex. 3-38), BoeingAerospace (Ex. 3-57) and the Carolinas Branch of the AGC (Exs. 3-39 and3-82) requested that OSHA permit employers to use warning devices so thatoperators could be alerted to two-blocking situations and avoid two-blockingaccidents. These commenters stated that requiring positive acting deviceswould impose unreasonable economic burdens; that many cranes and derricks,particularly older ones, could not be retrofitted; and that anti-two-blockingdevices require excessive maintenance, are unreliable, and are misusedor abused by operators. On the other hand, comments by Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Exs. 3-47 and 3-81)and Kenny Construction Company (Ex. 3-56), in addition to testimony bythe Operating Engineers at the public hearing (Tr. 454-457), indicatedthat workable anti-two-blocking ``stop and hold'' devices are availableand should be required. BWB Controls, Inc. (Ex. 3-63), a manufacturer ofanti-two-blocking warning devices, submitted product literature and testimonialsattesting to the reliability of its products. OSHA also noted that theCAL/OSHA hearing transcript from May 12, 1983, submitted by opponents ofa requirement for anti-two-blocking devices (Exs. 3-28 and 3-66), alsoincluded testimony that the devices were, in fact, available and workable.OSHA does not believe that alarm devices or shouted warnings would provideeffective protection for hoisted personnel because they place too muchreliance on operator reaction time. For example, the system may functionproperly, but the operator may be distracted by the noise of the constructionsite, or the noise of the crane engine and hoist mechanism and not noticethe alarm or warning for several seconds, or the reaction time of the operatormay simply be too slow. In either case, a two-blocking incident could easilyresult. Therefore, because the Agency believes that only two-blocking preventivedevices will provide the necessary employee protection, OSHA has not followedthe pertinent ANSI standard. As stated in its discussion of Issue 7, above,OSHA has, in part, based it decision not to promulgate a separate automaticbrake requirement on its determination that the brake mechanism of an anti-two-blockingdevice will provide reliable protection for hoisted personnel.OSHA concludes, based on the evidence in the record and its regulatoryimpact analysis, that the anti-two- blocking device requirement is bothfeasible and cost effective. The Agency agrees that cranes equipped withthese devices require more maintenance than cranes which are not so equipped.OSHA notes, however, that this maintenance would be comparable to thatrequired on the alarm devices which many commenters recommended. The majormaintenance and malfunction concern with either system is the switch atthe boom tip. OSHA believes that proper maintenance of the device and propertreatment during rig up, rig down, and transport, coupled with proper adjustmentof the device once the crane is in place, will prevent the reported unreliabilityand malfunctioning. OSHA has received a considerable amount of information regarding the misuseof anti-two blocking devices by operators. OSHA has determined that theproper selection and training of operators is necessary to prevent themisuse of these devices as ``operational controls.'' In particular, operatorsmust be taught that an anti-two-blocking device is a backup for properoperator control, and must not be used routinely as a stopping device.Therefore, based on its review of the evidence in the record, which includesmany two-blocking accident reports, such as the one discussed earlier inthis preamble (Cheyenne, Wyoming, 1973), OSHA is promulgating paragraph(g)(3)(ii)(C) as proposed, except that the term ``fall ball'' has beenreplaced by the term ``overhaul ball,'' to conform with current industryterminology. Paragraph (g)(4) provides design criteria, platform specifications, loadingrequirements and rigging requirements for personnel platforms. Paragraph (g)(4)(i) provides design criteria for personnel platforms. Oneproposed provision, paragraph (g)(4)(i)(D), has been moved to paragraph(g)(4)(ii)(E) because it involves platform specifications. The languageof the remaining three provisions is identical to that in the proposal,except as discussed below. Paragraph (g)(4)(i)(A) requires the employer to ensure that personnel platformsand suspension systems are designed by a qualified engineer or qualifiedperson who has demonstrated skill and experience in structural design.The term ``qualified'' is defined in andSection; 1926.32(e). In the proposedstandard, this provision required that the employer have a qualified engineerdesign the platform, based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 5.1. The Statesof Maryland and California (Exs. 3-19 and 3-33) commented favorably onthe proposed requirement. However, the International Cargo Gear BureauInc. (ICGBI) (Ex. 3-1) asserted that the proposed language was too vagueand asked OSHA to specify design criteria and accredit persons who wouldcertify that the platforms were built to specifications. The ICGBI didnot express an opinion on the need to require that only engineers providethe certification. On the other hand, Magma Copper (Ex. 3-27) and LundaConstruction Company (Ex. 3-92) suggested that only a ``competent'' individualis necessary to design a personnel platform. OSHA notes that the term ``competentperson'' has a unique meaning by definition in $1926.32(f). However, theMagma Copper and Lunda Construction comments appear to use the term ``competent''to indicate that the person designing the platform must be ``competent''to design and construct platforms which meet this standard, and that aperson need not be an engineer to demonstrate such competence. In otherwords, they indicate that the standard should not require design by anengineer, because platforms can be properly designed by knowledgeable non-engineers,as well. OSHA agrees that some individuals, who lack engineering degrees,have the requisite skill and experience to design and construct a personnelplatform which meets the requirements of the standard. Based on the abovediscussion, OSHA has determined, notwithstanding ANSI A10.28-1983, thatdesign by a qualified engineer or a qualified person with specific structuraldesign skills and experience will ensure that a personnel platform andits rigging provide the necessary employee protection and has revised thisprovision as noted. This paragraph has also been modified to make it clear that the suspensionsystem (i.e., the permanently attached rigging), as well as the platform,must be designed by a qualified engineer or qualified person. Based oncomments from Bechtel (Ex. 3-45), OSHA determined that the compatibilityof the platform structure with the attached rigging is critical to safehoisting. OSHA also notes that the rigging is subject to the same loadsand operating conditions as the platform, and that the platform tackleis often attached to the platform at the time the platform is made. TheAgency notes that in some circumstances the person who designs the platformwill also design the tackle attached to the platform.Proposed paragraph (g)(4)(i)(B) required that the suspension system forpersonnel platforms be designed to minimize tipping. The Agency receivedvery few comments on this provision. Bechtel (Ex. 3-45) commented thatthe requirement was unnecessary in light of the preceding paragraph. TheState of Maryland (Ex. 3-19) suggested that OSHA require a suspension systemconsisting of a factory-made wire bridle with four legs and suspended at60 degrees to the horizontal, because this configuration has a known ratedcapacity and is easily inspected. OSHA notes that employers use personnelplatforms to access a wide variety of workplaces and believes a specificbridle configuration would not be appropriate with all platforms or forall hoists. In addition, as was stated in the discussion of the previousparagraph, OSHA has determined that requiring qualified engineers or qualifiedpersons to design the bridle provides adequate protection. Therefore, OSHAwill not prescribe what tackle may be used. The ICGBI (Ex. 3-1) arguedthat the requirement should be ``to prevent tipping.'' OSHA agrees withthe ICGBI that ``to prevent tipping'' is the desired goal, but believesit is not feasible to prevent tipping totally, due to the nature of personnelplatforms. Therefore, this paragraph is promulgated as proposed. Proposed paragraph (g)(4)(i)(C) required that personnel platforms be designedwith a minimum safety factor of five. As discussed under paragraph (g)(3)(i)(B),above, OSHA is incorporating language related to safety factors which theAgency believes will express clearly the regulatory intent of the provision.OSHA based this provision on ANSI standards B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(b)(3)and A10.28-1983, section 5.2. In 1974, as noted in the proposal, the ACCSH recommended a safety factorof six for the design of personnel platforms. In 1983, the ACCSH discussedsetting a safety factor for personnel platforms, but made no recommendations.OSHA specifically requested input regarding the sufficiency of the proposedsafety factor in Issue 4 of the proposal (49 FR at 6283). Bechtel (Ex. 3-45) stated that the proposed safety factor of five was ``unnecessaryand wasteful,'' because existing American Institute of Steel Construction(AISC) specifications provided sufficient guidance for the design of personnelplatforms, just as they already did for other temporary personnel supports.''The Department of the Air Force, Milwaukee Construction Industry SafetyCouncil, National Constructors Association and Unit Crane andamp; Shovel(Exs. 3-24, 3-26, 3-30 and 3-47) expressed support for the proposed safetyfactor. In particular, Unit Crane cited ANSI B30.5-1982 to support thisprovision and noted that, ``since a platform is not subject to the samesorts of fatigue as running ropes,'' there was no inconsistency in supportingfive as a safety factor for platforms, while suggesting that OSHA set thewire rope safety factor at 10. The Boeing Company (Ex. 3-38) recommended setting the safety factor atfour, as provided in the andSection; 1910.28(a)(4) requirements for ``suspendedscaffolds,'' so that the provision would be consistent with the ``safetyfactors established for similar set ups.'' Boeing Aerospace (Ex. 3-57)disagreed with this recommendation, suggesting that ``the safety factorshould be at least 5,'' because personnel platforms are exposed to hazards,such as snagging, which ordinary scaffolds do not confront. Boeing Aerospacealso stated that setting the safety factor at five was appropriate so thathoisted personnel would have at least as much protection as hoisted material,citing andSection; 1926.251(c)(i), rigging, and andSection; 1926.251(f)(1),shackles and hooks for material handling. The United Steelworkers of America and the Spartan Equipment Company (Exs.3-10 and 3-82) suggested that setting the platform safety factor at 10would provide adequate protection. In particular, the United Steelworkersstated that the higher the safety factor, the greater the assurance thatOSHA is satisfying its statutory duty to protect employees. Norpac Engineering (Ex. 3-88) suggested that OSHA set personnel platformsafety factors which are comparable to those for elevator design and whichare at least as safe as those required for scaffolds. OSHA has determinedthat the current ANSI standard for Elevators, A17.1-1984, is not an appropriatereference because it does not provide clear guidance for the constructionof personnel platforms. Norpac (Ex. 3-88) also recommended that OSHA usethe scaffold standards, andSection;andSection; 1926.28(a)(4) and 1926.451(a)(7)which, as noted above, require a safety factor of four. OSHA has determined that setting the platform safety factor at five providesadequate protection for hoisted personnel, consistent with the applicableconsensus standards and most of the comments received. In addition, theAgency believes that neither the AISC specifications nor the ANSI elevatorstandard provides the specific pertinent information which an employerneeds to fabricate a platform properly. Furthermore, OSHA has determinedthat setting the safety factor at four, as is required under the scaffoldstandard, would not adequately protect hoisted personnel because, as notedby Boeing Aerospace (Ex. 3-57), platforms are exposed to hazards whichsuspended scaffolds do not face.OSHA also has determined that it is unnecessary to set the safety factorat six or ten, as recommended by the ACCSH and certain commenters because,as observed by Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47), five is recognized byANSI as  providing adequate protection under the conditions where platformsare used. Accordingly, the Agency promulgates this paragraph as revisedand has added an explanation to clarify that the criteria for guardrailsand body belt/harness system anchorage points are found in other Subpartsof the Construction Standards. OSHA believes that this revision will clarifythe requirements and increase consistency within the construction standards,thereby improving compliance. Proposed paragraph (g)(4)(i)(D) required that personnel platforms havesix feet minimum headroom. The commenters uniformly considered this provisionas overly restrictive in that it limited the employer's flexibility. EbascoConstructors and the International Brotherhood of Boilermakers. (Exs. 3-6and 3-53) suggested a minimum height of six feet, six inches. The NationalAssociation of Demolition Contractors and Parson Corporation (Exs. 3-8and 3-22) suggested seven feet. Other commenters, such as Magma Copper,Bechtel, Unit Crane andamp; Shovel and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico (Exs.3-27, 3-45, 3-47 and 3-55), suggested that OSHA simply require ``adequate''headroom. OSHA agrees that specifying a minimum height is unnecessary toprotect workers and has deleted this specification from paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(E)of the final rule. OSHA has also determined that the headroom requirementsfor hoisted personnel are already properly addressed in paragraph (g)(4)(ii),``Platform specifications,'' instead of in paragraph (g)(4)(i), ``Designcriteria.'' Paragraph (g)(4)(ii) of this final rule specifies that personnel platformsmust have certain features. Proposed paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(A) required employers to equip personnelplatforms with perimeter protection from the floor to 42 inches, plus orminus three inches, which would consist of either solid construction orexpanded metal with openings no greater than one-half inch. This provisionwas based on andSection; 1926.500(f) and ANSI A10.28-1983, section 5.6. Commenters,including the National Association of Demolition Contractors, EquitableGas, the Associated General Contractors of America and Standard Oil (Indiana)(Exs. 3-8, 3-25, 3-28 and 3-46), stated that standard guardrails have satisfactorilyprevented accidental falls. Commenters, such as Columbia Nitrogen and theMilwaukee Construction Industry Safety Council (Ex. 3-26 and 3-58), suggestedthat OSHA permit the use of standard guardrails, except with six inch or12 inch toe plates in lieu of enclosure between the toe plate and mid-rail.In addition, commenters, such as Granite Construction (Ex. 3-50) and OrganizationResources Counselors, Inc. (Ex. 3-32 and 3-89) stated that requiring enclosureto 42 inches, as proposed, would unnecessarily interfere with the intendeduse of the platform. The State of Maryland (Ex. 3-19) noted that the requirementwould necessitate the frequent repositioning of the platform to make thework area accessible. Further, Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47) commented that permitting theuse of solid sidewalls would increase the tendency of a platform to swingin the wind and recommended that only expanded metal be allowed. On the other hand, the Boeing Company (Ex. 3-38), Boeing Aerospace (Ex.3-57), and the Salt River Project (SRP) (Ex. 3-61) stated that the proposedenclosure requirement was ``acceptable.'' The Boeing commenters also statedthat ``Guardrails have been satisfactory,'' and SRP noted that it has avariance for certain operations which require top guardrails at 30 inches.OSHA has revised this provision to require simply that the employer providea guardrail system which meets the requirements of Subpart M. OSHA anticipatesthat employers will already be familiar with the requirements for guardrailsystems in Subpart M, so it would be unnecessary to set out specificationsin this provision. OSHA notes that, under Subpart M, the required heightfor a top rail is approximately 42 inches, as was proposed. In addition,OSHA has determined that perimeter enclosure between the toe board andthe midrail of the guardrail provides appropriate platform level protectionagainst the hazard to employees below from falling objects. Further, OSHAhas determined that since perimeter enclosure will only be required betweenthe toe board and the mid-rail, swinging will not pose difficulties andemployers will have flexibility to address workplace circumstances. Paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(B) requires that the employer provide a grab railinside the entire perimeter of the personnel platform. This provision isbased, in part, on A10.28-1983, section 5.8. The proposal did not specifythat the grab rail would extend along the entire inside perimeter of theplatform. OSHA revised the provision because it determined that, as notedby the State of Maryland (Ex. 3-19) and Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47),a worker might not otherwise have a grab rail readily available when needed.The Salt River Project (Ex. 3-61) suggested that the top rail of a platformconstitutes an adequate grab rail. OSHA, however, believes that permittingthe use of the top rail as a grab rail would expose employees to the riskof having their hands smashed against external objects while grabbing thetop rail. The ACCSH drew a clear distinction between the use of the guardrailto prevent falls and the use of a grab rail to help employees maintainbalance during hoists (Tr. 5-23-83, pp. 123-124.) Therefore, OSHA has determinedthat the required grab rails must be inside the personnel platform, andpromulgates this provision as revised.Proposed paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(C) required that an access gate, if provided,must not swing outward during hoisting and must be equipped with a restrainingdevice to prevent accidental opening. This provision was based on ANSIA10.28-1983, section 5.4 and B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(b)(7). The Agencyhas decided, however, to relocate the restraining device requirement toa separate provision (paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(D)) of this final rule, forthe sake of clarity. OSHA received several comments, including those fromEbasco Constructors, The National Constructors Association and GraniteConstruction (Exs. 3-6, 3-30 and 3-50), which suggested a revision of theproposed rule to permit the use of sliding or folding gates. Since themodifications requested are in line with the Agency's original intent,paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(D) of the final rule reflects the acceptability ofthese other approaches and incorporates the proposed requirement for restrainingdevices. This provision is discussed further below. OSHA also received comments from the Carolinas Branch of the AGC (Exs.3-39 and 3-82) which requested that OSHA permit the access gate on smallplatforms to swing out when there is not room for it to swing in. The Agencyhas not adopted this suggestion because, as noted by Unit Crane andamp; Shovel(Ex. 3-47), an outward opening gate could strike against a wall or otherobject during hoisting, possibly upsetting the platform. In addition, OSHAis concerned that an improperly designed outward opening gate could openaccidentally if objects or personnel inside the platform were thrown againstit. On the other hand, OSHA recognizes that the restrictive approach ofthe proposed standard is not necessary to protect workers because the Agencyknows of platforms which do not conform to the proposed rule but whichadequately protect occupants. OSHA also recognizes that some personnelplatforms are used in emergency situations to transport injured employeeson stretchers or to effect rescues. In such circumstances access gatesthat only swing inward would create access and egress problems, especiallyon smaller platforms. OSHA also notes that sliding or folding gates maynot be feasible for a given personnel platform. The Agency does not wishto preclude the use of properly designed personnel platforms in emergencysituations by requiring a gate swing which would render them useless. In order to resolve these conflicting concerns, OSHA has decided that accessgates that swing, must be configured so that they do not open outward duringhoisting. OSHA notes that it is technically feasible and equally protectiveto install a single gate which is capable of swinging both inwardly andoutwardly, provided that the gate not open outwardly during hoisting. Therefore,based on the above discussion, OSHA promulgates this paragraph as revisedand relocated. Paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(D) requires that access gates be equipped with a restrainingdevice to prevent accidental opening. This provision was proposed as partof paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(C). The Agency determined that, because of theabove-described revisions to paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(C), retaining this provisionwithin paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(C) could obscure this important requirement.Therefore, the Agency decided to incorporate the appropriate comments receivedon this provision and promulgate the revised requirement as a separateprovision. The comments received on this provision are discussed aboveunder paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(C). As discussed above, paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(E) of this final rule presentsthe revised requirements of proposed paragraph (g)(4)(i)(D) for adequateheadroom in the personnel platform. Specifically, this provision requiresthat platforms have headroom which allows employees to stand upright. OSHAhas determined that this performance-oriented approach is appropriate fora provision where, as the commenters observed, the circumstances for itsapplication may vary significantly. Therefore as revised and relocated,OSHA is promulgating this provision. Paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(F) requires that personnel platforms have overheadprotection when there is employee exposure to falling objects. This provisionis based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 5.5, and B30.5-1982, section 5.3.2.2(b)(8).This requirement is similar to that in proposed paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(D),and has been shifted because of the addition or relocation of paragraphs,as discussed above. OSHA requested additional information on the need for overhead protectionon personnel platforms in Issue 6. A number of commenters, such as theState of Alaska (Ex. 3-4), Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47) and KennyConstruction (Ex. 3-56), agreed that overhead protection should be required``as needed.'' Several commenters, including the State of Maryland (Ex.3-19) and the AGC of America (Exs. 3-28 and 3-67) expressed general supportfor the requirement, while noting that certain work cannot be performedwhen overhead protection is in place. Unit Crane (Ex. 3-47) noted thatthe boom tip and hoist lines above the platform effectively block workwhich is directly overhead and constitute falling object hazards becausethey may be lowered into a landed platform. Unit Crane also noted that,``Anytime the occupants must work above shoulder height and might be restrictedfrom the work piece (SIC) by overhead protection, such a condition canbe eliminated by merely elevating the platform another three feet.'' Gulf Oil (Ex. 3-68), stated that overhead protection on the platform wasunnecessary and would reduce visibility. Gulf suggested that, ``If a hazardof falling objects is present, a more positive means of protection shouldbe provided other than assuming the personnel platform would withstandthe dropping objects.'' Gulf Oil, however, did not specify any ``positivemeans.'' The Carolinas Branch of the AGC (Exs. 3-39 and 3-82) observedthat requiring overhead protection would negate the possibility of employeestying off to anything other than the platform itself, an action which isuseless and impractical. The Carolinas Branch was apparently concernedthat if the platform tipped or fell the lanyard attached to an employee'sbody belt or harness would pull the employee up against the overhead protection,preventing escape from the platform and increasing the likelihood and severityof injuries. The Carolinas Branch was also concerned that ``work from aplatform often must be done above the top of the platform, such as, butnot limited to: Rubbing concrete; form work; passing and receiving toolsand material, etc.'' In addition, the Al Johnson Company (Ex. 3-42) statedthat the proposed overhead protection was unnecessary because it is moreeffectively handled under the general safety regulations which limit workoverhead * * *''. Some commenters, including Equitable Gas, Standard Oil(Indiana) and Organization Resources Counselors (Exs. 3-25, 3-46 and 3-89),suggested that requiring the use of hard hats would generally be preferableto requiring overhead protection.OSHA has determined, based on the evidence in the record, that hoistedpersonnel who are exposed to falling objects need overhead protection.Given the small area of a personnel platform, OSHA is concerned that workerswould not be able to avoid falling materials, and that head protectionalone would not be sufficient. OSHA notes that this provision is consistentwith the requirements for scaffolds in andSection;andSection; 1926.451(a)(16)and 1926.451(h)(13), which require overhead protection when employees workingon other types of scaffolds are exposed to overhead hazards. The Agencyis concerned that overhead protection and the use of hard hats could beviewed as either equivalent or mutually exclusive. Therefore, OSHA hasadded language to this provision so it is clear that overhead protectionis required in addition to the use of hard hats. The final rule is drafted in performance-oriented language which requiresthat employers install the protective covering whenever employees are exposedto falling objects. Therefore; when there is no potential for injury, whetherdue to the nature of the work or the work practices enforced at the workplace,the employer need not provide overhead protection other than hard hats.OSHA notes that this paragraph does not prohibit the use of a personnelplatform with overhead protection that incorporates a removable top, ahinged top, or a trap door to permit overhead work, if such work is necessary,as long as the necessary overhead protection function is not compromised.In addition, this paragraph does not prohibit the use of transparent materialsto provide a viewing port in the overhead protection. In response to the concern that overhead protection would complicate tyingoff (as required by paragraph (g)(6)(viii) of the final rule), the Agencynotes that the requirement to tie off is intended to protect employeesfrom falling in the event the platform tips or the employees are thrownfrom the platform. It is not intended to protect workers in the event thatthe platform breaks free of the load line or hook. Most of the remainingprovisions of the standard focus on preventing the platform from dropping.These provisions, such as the requirement for tests, derating and preventionof two-blocking are intended to prevent situations where the personnelplatform breaks free of the load line or hook. Paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(G) of this final rule requires employers to ensurethat all rough edges of the platform exposed to employee contact are sosurfaced as to prevent injury to employees from punctures or lacerations.This paragraph, based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 6.1, is similar to (g)(4)(ii)(E)of the proposal, but has been rephrased to clarify OSHA's intent. The Agencyreceived virtually no comment on this provision. Bechtel (Ex. 3-45) assertedthat this requirement was a matter of common sense and that it need notbe covered by an OSHA standard. OSHA believes that this provision providesnecessary guidance to employers, so it is promulgating this provision asrevised. Proposed paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(H) has been deleted from the final rule.That proposed paragraph required that a personnel platform be readily identifiableby color or marking. This provision was based on ANSI B30.5-1982, section5-3.2.2(b)(9). Most of the comments received, such as those from Magma Copper, Bechtel,and Granite Construction (Exs. 3-27, 3-45 and 3-50), indicated that thisprovision was unnecessary and would impose high maintenance costs. TheState of California and Boeing Company (Exs. 3-33 and 3-38) supported theproposed provision. OSHA has determined, based on its consideration ofthe record, that the proposed provision is not needed to protect workers,given the other provisions of paragraph (g) which cover the design, construction,testing and use of the personnel platform. The Agency, therefore has eliminatedproposed paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(H). Paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(H) requires that all welding of the platform and componentsbe performed by a qualified welder familiar with the weld grades, typesand materials specified in the design. This provision, which is virtuallyidentical to proposed paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(F), is based on ANSI A10.28-1983,section 6.3.In addition, OSHA solicited comments on whether a welder who is ``qualified''as defined in andSection; 1926.32(1) is sufficient or if a certified welderwould be more appropriate. Magma Copper (Ex. 3-27) cautioned OSHA regardinguse of the term ``qualified,'' because ``Any experienced * * * welder couldassemble a cage.'' Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47) suggested that OSHArequire American Welding Society certified-welders, while the BoilermakersUnion (Ex. 3-53) suggested that OSHA require that fabrication be done bya certified welder who has passed a welding test that meets the specificationsof the ASME welding code. On the other hand, Puerto Rico (Ex. 3-55) suggestedthat requiring a ``qualified'' welder, as understood in terms of section1926.32(1), provided adequate assurance that the platform would be safe.The Agency believes that requiring welder certification or specifying aparticular set of credentials for a platform welder would not improve employeeprotection. Indeed, OSHA agrees with Puerto Rico that the term ``qualified,''as defined, provides appropriate assurances that the welder assigned toconstruct a personnel platform will assemble it properly. Paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(I) of this final rule requires that employers postpersonnel platforms with plates or other permanent markings indicatingthe platform weight and its rated load capacity or maximum intended load.This provision is based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 5-3 and, in part,on B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(b)(4). This requirement was proposed asparagraph (g)(4)(ii)(G) and has been redesignated. A few commenters, including the International Cargo Gear Bureau, the UnitedSteelworkers, and Norpac Engineering, Inc. (Exs. 3-1, 3-10 and 3-88), suggestedthat the marking also indicate the maximum number of personnel who maybe lifted. OSHA notes that ANSI B30.5-1983, section 5-3.2.2(b)(4), providesthat the plate shall specify the maximum number of persons to be hoisted.In addition, the United Steelworkers of America (Ex. 3-10) recommendedthat this provision be revised to include a platform certification requirement,with the certification posted on the platform. OSHA has determined that the platform posting provision as proposed willprovide adequate protection for hoisted workers by alerting everyone involvedin a lift of the rated load capacity or maximum intended load of the platform.Furthermore, insofar as A10.28 and B30.5 differ in their provisions formarking of personnel platforms, OSHA has decided to rely on ANSI A10.28-1983,which exclusively covers personnel platforms, rather than B30.5-1982, whichfocuses on cranes, in deciding not to require the plate to state the maximumnumber of passengers. The Agency believes that an additional requirementto post the personnel platform with the maximum number of passengers willnot add to the degree of employee protection provided by the requirementto post the maximum intended load or rated load capacity. Finally, OSHAhas determined that although a personnel platform designed and built atthe worksite may not have a rated load capacity (such capacities are normallydetermined for manufactured platforms) the design will have been basedon a determinable maximum intended load. In those situations where a platformdoes not have a rated load capacity, the maximum intended load shall beposted. Therefore, this paragraph is being promulgated as revised. Paragraph (g)(4)(iii) of this final rule covers personnel platform loading.Paragraph (g)(4)(iii)(A) prohibits loading the platform in excess of itsrated load capacity or maximum intended load, whichever is less. This provisionis similar to the proposed requirement and is based on ANSI B30.5-1982,sections 5-3.2.1.1-(b) and (c). The Agency received no comments which opposedthis requirement. Ebasco Constructors (Ex. 3-6) suggested that OSHA basethe rated load capacity on a specified minimum pounds-per-square-foot requirement.The performance-oriented language of the provision, as originally proposed,allows the employer to determine what criteria are used to rate the capacityof the personnel platform. OSHA believes that this provision, when coupledwith the design, construction, and testing requirements presented in thisstandard, will provide adequate protection for employees. As noted above,a job built and designed personnel platform may not have a rated capacity,but the design will have been based on a maximum intended load. Therefore,for platforms whose rated load capacity has not been determined, or forwhich there is no such rating, the employer can comply with this provisionby ensuring that the maximum intended load is not exceeded. Paragraph (g)(4)(iii)(B) limits the number of employees being hoisted tothose required to do the work. This provision, which is identical to theproposed requirement, is based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 12.2. OSHAspecifically requested additional input on this subject in Issue 3. Manycommenters, especially contractors such as Parsons, Johnson Bros. and Granite(Exs. 3-22, 3-43 and 3-50), supported the provision as proposed. Supportivecomments were also received from the Boilermakers Union (Ex. 3-53). As indicated by the discussion of paragraph (g)(4)(ii)(I) above, some commenterssuggested that OSHA limit the number of employees to be hoisted and thatthe maximum intended load and rated load capacity be based on that numberof employees times a pounds per employee load factor (Exs. 3-24, 3-27,3-33, 3-47, 3-76, and 3-82).However, other commenters, such as Puerto Rico (Ex. 3-55) and the SaltRiver Project (Ex. 3-61), asserted that OSHA should focus on preventingloads from exceeding capacity, not on the number of employees needed toperform work duties. OSHA agrees with those commenters who favored compliancecapacity requirements set forth in terms of total load weight. Indeed,OSHA has determined that compliance with the load limits of the platformand maintenance of the platform safety factor established by the standardwill provide the necessary protection, while allowing the employer theflexibility to determine how many employees must be hoisted to performassigned work. The Agency believes that specifying a limit on the numberof hoisted personnel would unreasonably restrict the determination of howmany workers are required to perform a particular task safely. Accordingly,OSHA has promulgated this paragraph unchanged. Paragraph (g)(4)(iii)(C) limits the occupancy of the personnel platformto employees, and the tools and materials necessary to do the work theyare assigned. This provision reflects input from the ACCSH which urgedOSHA to ensure that personnel platforms were not used as material hoists(Tr. 5-23-83 pp. 50-52). Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47) recommendedthat OSHA prohibit the use of personnel platforms to hoist bulk materialbecause a shifting load could endanger the hoisted personnel. The CarolinasBranch of the AGC (Exs. 3-48 and 3-82) opposed such a restriction on transportingmaterial in bulk or other loads not related to the task to be performedon personnel platforms, as long as the capacity of the platform was notexceeded. OSHA believes that compliance with capacity limitations abovedoes not provide adequate assurance of employee safety when loading personnelplatforms. OSHA believes that it is less likely that the appropriate concernfor capacity limitations would be shown when using a personnel platformas a material hoist. This misuse would cause structural fatigue which maynot be readily detected by inspection, until failure occurs. The Agencyreiterates its concern that personnel hoisting, insofar as it is permittedunder the terms of this standard, must satisfy more demanding criteriathan are required for material hoisting. Given the special concern OSHAhas expressed regarding the hazards of personnel hoisting, the Agency hasdetermined that it would be inappropriate to allow personnel platformsto be used as material hoists. In addition, the Agency believes that anyblurring of the distinction between personnel hoisting and material hoistingwould increase the likelihood of operator error. Therefore, OSHA is promulgatingthis paragraph as proposed, with a clarification that the platforms arenot to be used for other purposes when they are not hoisting personnel.Proposed paragraph (g)(4)(iii)(D) has been separated into two provisionsfor the sake of clarity, but the provisions will be discussed jointly sinceit was proposed as one provision. The proposed paragraph required thatmaterials on a personnel platform be secured and evenly distributed whilethe platform is in motion. Paragraph (g)(4)(iii)(D) requires that materialsand tools on an occupied personnel platform be secured to prevent displacement.Paragraph (g)(4)(iii)(E) requires materials to be evenly distributed withinthe confines of the platform. These provisions are based on ANSI A10.28-1983,section 8.1. The few comments received support these provisions in principle.The Boeing Company and Boeing Aerospace (Exs. 3-38 and 3-57), however,suggested that OSHA change the wording to ``loaded in such a way that theydo not present a hazard to personnel.'' Ebasco Construction (Ex. 3-6) suggestedthat the language be changed to require materials to be ``evenly distributedwithin the confines of the platform.'' The Agency believes that the Boeingcommenters' suggested revision provides less guidance to the employer,and would be less protective than the requirement, as proposed. On theother hand, OSHA has determined that Ebasco's suggested language betterexpresses OSHA's original intent that the load be evenly distributed withinthe platform. Therefore, the Agency has adopted Ebasco's suggested changeand promulgates these paragraphs as revised and separated. Paragraph (g)(4)(iv) addresses the rigging used to suspend personnel platforms.Paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(A) requires that if a rope bridle is used to connectthe personnel platform to the load line, the bridle legs shall be connectedto a master link or shackle, so that the weight of the platform is evenlydistributed among the bridle legs. The State of California (Ex. 3-33) suggested requiring that four part bridlesbe designed as if only two legs were supporting the platform to ensurestability, because the weight of the loaded platform would probably notbe evenly distributed. Although this suggestion, in general, is technicallysound rigging practice, OSHA has determined that other bridle configurationswill provide the necessary protection In addition, OSHA believes that thebridle configuration suggested by the State of California may not be appropriatein all circumstances. Therefore, OSHA has determined that the requirement,as proposed, provides the necessary protection for hoisted employees. Lift-All Company, Inc., the Boeing Company and Boeing Aerospace (Exs. 3-13,3-38 and 3-57) commented that the use of the term ``ring'' in paragraph(g)(4)(iv)(A) was inappropriate. They suggested that OSHA use the term``master link'' adopted by ANSI B30.9-1984, ``Slings''. OSHA has decidedthat the suggested change is proper and has reworded the final rule accordingly.Standard Oil (Indiana) (Ex. 3-46) expressed concern that this provisionas proposed would not permit alternatives to wire rope bridles and requestedthat OSHA clearly state that such alternatives were permitted. OSHA believesthat it is sufficiently clear from the use of the expression ``when a wirerope bridle is used'' that OSHA is simply taking into account the consequencesof a particular rigging choice and does not mean to limit the choice ofequipment. Therefore, OSHA has not made the requested change. The Organization Resources Counselors (Ex. 3-32) asserted that hoistedpersonnel would be safer if OSHA permitted bridle legs to be attached tothe hook individually, rather than joined at a single ring or shackle.OSHA has determined that the suggested change would allow hoisted personnelto be exposed to greater danger than would be permitted under the standardas proposed, because the displacement of any one of the bridle legs couldcause the platform to tip. Therefore, the suggested change has not beenmade. Paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(B) requires that the hooks or other attachment assembliesused for rigging personnel hoists be of types that can be closed and locked.This provision, which is identical to the proposed requirement, is basedon ANSI A10.28-1983, section 9.2. OSHA highlighted this subject in Issue8. Many commenters, including Johnson Bros. Corporation, Unit Crane andamp;Shovel and Lunda Construction Company (Ex. 3-43, 3-47 and 3-92), stronglysupported this requirement. On the other hand, Bechtel (Ex. 3-45) assertedthat this provision was redundant with existing safety standards, and theAmerican Road andamp; Transportation Builders Association (ARTBA) (Ex. 3-65)stated that the proposed requirements were ``excessively descriptive andrestrictive,'' though ARTBA did suggest that OSHA require positive lockingdevices on hooks. As has been discussed above, OSHA believes that the hoistingof personnel requires even greater care than the hoisting of material,so the precautions required by this paragraph are necessary. Some commenters, such as Standard Oil (Indiana) (Ex. 3-46) and Gulf Oil(Ex. 3-68), suggested that OSHA permit ``mousing,'' a practice by whichwire rope is wrapped around a hook to cover the hook opening and to preventthe dropping of a hoisted load, as an alternative to the shackles and lockinghooks required in the proposed standard. These commenters asserted thatmousing was a safe and proven technique and that the provision, as proposed,would impose hardship. Indeed, ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(b)(10),recognizes mousing as a means of securing the hook opening for personnelhoisting operations. Other commenters, including Parsons Corporation (Ex.3-22), the State of California (Ex. 3-33), the Boilermakers Union (Ex.3-53) and NORPAC Engineering (Ex. 3-88), asserted that OSHA should notallow mousing. These commenters stated that mousing was unsafe and thata strong, securely locked hook should be used instead. In addition, theInternational Union of Operating Engineers testified (Tr. 465-466) thatmousing does not close a hook opening and that properly closing safetyhooks are available. OSHA has determined that mousing would not provide the necessary assurancethat a personnel platform would not be dropped, because the platform couldstill slip off the hook despite the mousing. The Agency agrees with thosecommenters who suggest that only hooks whose openings lock closed may beused. Therefore, OSHA has not made the suggested revision. OSHA has followedANSI A10.28 instead of ANSI B30.5 in this case, because the Agency believesthat permitting mousing under this standard would not effectuate the purposesof the OSHA Act. OSHA has revised the wording of proposed paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(B) in severalplaces to clarify the intended meaning. As was the case with paragraph(g)(3)(ii)(C), the term ``overhaul ball'' has replaced ``fall ball'' tobe consistent with current industry terminology. In addition, OSHA hasreplaced the term ``screw pin'' with ``bolt'' and has specified that anyshackles used must be of the ``alloy anchor-type,'' in response to commentsfrom Columbus McKinnon Corporation (Ex. 3-16), which reflect current usagein the industry. Otherwise, this paragraph has been promulgated unchanged.Proposed paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(C) required that all wire rope and hardwareused to rig personnel platforms have a minimum safety factor of seven,in order to be consistent with the proposed load line (running rope) safetyfactor. Issue 4 of the proposal discussed the proposed equipment safetyfactors and solicited additional input. Some commenters, including Lift-Alland the Wire Rope Technical Board (Exs. 3-13 and 3-15), supported settingthe safety factor at seven. Other commenters, such as the Salt River Projectand the Spartan Equipment Co. (Exs. 3-61 and 3-82), ``accepted'' the proposedsafety factor, while Standard Oil (Indiana) (Ex. 3-46) simply took it asa ``given.'' Spartan suggested that setting the safety factor at five insteadof seven would still provide ``satisfactory'' protection. These commentseither did not provide a basis for using seven or they relied on the rationalepresented in the proposal to support setting seven as the safety factorfor hoist ropes. Unit Crane andamp; Shovel, the Boeing Company, and Boeing Aerospace (Exs.3-47, 3-38 and 3-57) suggested that OSHA set the safety factor for riggingat 10, based on the same authorities and rationale used to support theirsuggestion that the safety factor for running ropes be set at 10 (See discussionof paragraph (g)(3)(i)(A) of the final rule.) The Boeing commenters alsosuggested that OSHA require a higher safety factor when employers use rotationresistant rope. OSHA notes that Unit Crane would set different safety factorsfor the personnel platform and its ``attaching devices'' (safety factorof 5) on the one hand, and running ropes (safety factor of 10) on the other,citing ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(b)(3). This raises the questionwhether platform rigging should be considered part of the platform or partof the load line for the purpose of setting a safety factor for rigging.ANSI A10.28-1983 does not specify a safety factor for rigging, but it doesagree with ANSI B30.5-1982 in setting the safety factor for the personnelplatform at five. The National Constructors Association, Johnson Bros.Corporation and Granite Construction (Exs. 3-30, 3-43 and 3-50) suggestedsetting the rigging safety factor at five so that it would be consistentwith the personnel platform safety factor. Magma Copper and the AGC ofAmerica (Exs. 3-27 and 3-28) suggested that setting the safety factor forrigging at five would be adequate. In addition, Columbus McKinnon (Ex.3-16) opposed the proposed rigging safety factor of seven because it wasinconsistent with the industry practice regarding hooks (safety factorof three to five) and shackles (five to six). OSHA notes that the load imposed on the hoist line is greater than thatimposed on any single static line, such as a platform sling. Based on thecomments and the pertinent consensus standards, OSHA is convinced thatit is critical to provide employers with clear, readily applicable guidancefor designing the platform and its rigging. Accordingly, the Agency hasdetermined that the platform rigging safety factor should be the same asfor the platform itself and has revised the proposed paragraph to requirea safety factor of five. OSHA agrees that rotation resistant rope is subjectto greater and harder to detect deterioration than standard wire rope,therefore the Agency has set the safety factor for rotation resistant ropeat 10. Therefore, OSHA promulgates paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(C), as revised.Paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(D) requires that all eyes in wire rope slings be fabricatedwith thimbles to prevent excessive wear on the rigging. Magma Copper (Ex. 3-27) commented that thimbles were unnecessary, basedon its suggestion that OSHA set the wire rope and hardware safety factorsat five. In addition, Standard Oil (Indiana) (Ex. 3-46) commented thatthimbles would only be minimally useful, based on a safety factor of seven.The Salt River Project (Ex. 3-61) and Lunda Construction Company (Ex. 3-92)supported the proposed provision, with the Salt River Project emphasizingthat OSHA should require thimbles of the flemish eye type, rather thanthe fold back splice type. OSHA has determined that there is a reasonable basis for this requirementbecause thimbles are generally used in the fabrication of slings intendedfor use more than one time, whether hoisting material or personnel. Thimblesallow a smoother bending of the portion of wire rope used to make eyes,and help prevent kinks and crimps that would occur without the thimble.This results in less deformation of the wire rope, and, therefore, reducesdeterioration of the ropes strength. In keeping with the performance-orientedapproach OSHA has taken in setting requirements for personnel platforms,the Agency will not specify the type of thimble to be used. Therefore,this paragraph is promulgated unchanged. Paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(E) prohibits the use of personnel hoisting bridlesand other personnel hoisting rigging for any other purpose. This provisionappeared in the proposed standard as paragraph (g)(6)(x). It has been relocatedso it will appear with other provisions which regulate rigging. The Construction Industry Manufacturers Association (Ex. 3-31) recommendedthat ``no external load shall be lifted by attaching to the personnel platform.''The State of California (Ex. 3-33) and the National Constructors Association(Ex. 3-74), while generally opposed to hoisting of other loads, commentedthat it should be permitted in the isolated circumstances when need wasshown. The Milwaukee Construction Industry Safety Council (MCISC) (Ex.3-70) commented that a crane should not hoist other loads while employeesare aloft, suggesting that the platform be lowered when the workers needmore materials. DuPont (Ex. 3-75) and the State of Michigan (Ex. 3-84)suggested that OSHA expressly prohibit any other crane operations whileemployees are being hoisted. On the other hand, Kenny Construction (Ex.3-69) asserted that it needs to use a ``whip'' line to assist hoisted personnelin their work. As already stated in the discussion of paragraph (g)(4)(iii)(C), OSHA believesthat the use of a personnel platform for material hoisting would exposehoisted employees to increased risks. Given the close relationship betweenthe platform and the attached rigging, OSHA has concluded that the banon material hoisting should also apply to the rigging. In particular, OSHAhas determined based on the evidence in the record, that the danger ofexcessive wear and entanglement from hoisting other loads far outweighsthe convenience value of permitting the practice. OSHA has revised thelanguage to prohibit clearly the use of the rigging for other service andto make the language consistent with the similar restrictions for use ofthe platform found in paragraph (g)(4)(iii)(C). In addition, OSHA solicited comments in Issue 10 regarding the need foran additional sling (bridle) which would be in position to support thepersonnel platform in case the primary connection failed. Several commenters,such as Parsons Corporation, the U.S. Air Force and the Research and TradingCorporation (Exs. 3-22, 3-24 and 3-60) stated that a secondary bridle wasnecessary for protection of hoisted personnel. Other commenters, the BoeingCompany and Boeing Aerospace (Exs. 3-38 and 3-57), stated that secondarybridles were not always needed, particularly where independent lifelineswere feasible. The Boeing commenters noted that the ``safety'' bridle protectedagainst only one possible cause of platform fall. The State of California(Ex. 3-33) noted that a secondary bridle would not be needed where therequirement in proposed paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(B) for positive locking loadhook was satisfied and suggested that hooks be designed to ensure thatsecondary bridles would not be needed. The Milwaukee Construction IndustrySafety Council (Ex. 3-26), in turn, noted that a standard hook with a safetylatch would be sufficient to comply with proposed paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(B)if the second sling was required.On the other hand, the Northwest Engineering Company, the AGC of St. Louis,Unit Crane and Shovel and Norpac Engineering, Inc. (Exs. 3-3, 3-14, 3-47and 3-88) commented that a safety sling requirement was neither necessarynor desirable. In particular, the AGC of St. Louis and Unit Crane statedthat the proximity of the ``redundant'' sling to the load line would causedamage through chafing and tangling. Unit Crane added that compliance withthe proposed requirements for closing the hook throat, prohibiting freefall, using lifelines and performing prelift safety checks would properlyprotect hoisted personnel. In addition, the Boilermakers Union (Ex. 3-53)stated that there had been no accidents involving its members which indicatedneed for a safety bridle. The Boilermakers added that the ``rigorous testing''required under the proposed rule made the possibility of such an accident``virtually non-existent.'' OSHA agrees with the commenters who noted that compliance with the provisionsof the proposed rule, such as the requirements for hook throat closingand equipment testing, will protect hoisted personnel, so that a secondarysling is not needed. Paragraph (g)(5) of this final rule details the inspection and testingrequirements for cranes, derricks and platforms used to hoist personnel.This paragraph has been extensively revised, as discussed below. Paragraph (g)(5)(i) as proposed required the inspection, by a competentperson, of the crane or derrick used to hoist personnel, before each shiftand after material handling operations where the load exceeded 50 percentof the rated capacity. The Boeing Company and Boeing Aerospace (Exs. 3-38and 3-57) commented that the latter requirement would necessitate disruptivemid-shift inspections. In addition, the National Constructors Associationand Bechtel (Exs. 3-30 and 3-45) noted that inspections are already requiredby other paragraphs in andSection; 1926.550. OSHA has determined that any potential problem involving a crane or derricksupported personnel hoisting system or set-up would be detected throughcompliance with the existing requirements of andSection; 1926.550, or throughthe evaluation of a trial lift which satisfies the terms of new paragraph(g). Therefore, OSHA has deleted the inspection requirements set out inproposed paragraph (g)(5)(i). In the proposed rule, OSHA required that employers perform trial lifts,and the Agency provided guidance regarding the information to be obtainedthrough the trial lifts. OSHA recognizes that some commenters were confusedby the proposed language. OSHA intended to require that employers conduct trial lifts with the personnelplatform unoccupied. The trial lift would encompass the entire operationalcycle_from the point where an employee entered the platform; through eachwork location accessible from the set up location, in sequence; and, returnto the point where the employees would exit the platform. The trial liftwould be repeated each time the crane was set up in a new location. TheAgency position regarding this provision has not changed. In this finalrule, OSHA provides specific guidance to employers as to what must be determinedduring this trial lift. Commenters also expressed uncertainty regarding the Agency's purpose inrequiring trial lifts. Many commenters apparently confused the trial liftand proof testing requirements. In order to eliminate misunderstanding,OSHA notes that the purpose of the trial lift is to determine that thelift route is free of obstacles; to determine work location accessibility;to confirm that no work locations will place the crane or derrick in sucha configuration where the intended load would exceed the 50 percent limitof the crane's rated capacity; to ensure soil or other supporting surfacestability, and to determine suitability for the intended lift. The triallift is conducted just prior to commencing actual hoisting operations.The proof test, on the other hand, is conducted to test the capacity andconstruction of the personnel platform. Proof testing is required priorto hoisting personnel and after any repair or modification. The proof testand trial lift can be conducted simultaneously, as long as the specificrequirements for each are satisfied. Paragraph (g)(5)(i), as promulgated, requires that the operator performa full cycle operational trial lift before allowing personnel in the platform.This paragraph is similar to proposed paragraph (g)(5)(ii) and is basedon ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(a)(6). Additionally, this paragraphrequires the operator to determine that all systems, controls and safetydevices actuate and function properly; that there is nothing along thehoisting route which would interfere with the platform reaching the worklocation and returning; and that all configurations needed during the hoistingoperation will allow the operator to remain within the derated capacity.OSHA believes that the crane or derrick operator is the best and, probably,the only person qualified to make these determinations. Most of the commenters supported proposed paragraph (g)(5)(ii), althoughthey diverged as to the circumstances when the trial lift must be performed.A few commenters, such as Columbia Nitrogen (Ex. 3-58), stated that therequirement would impose a burden without providing a benefit, becausethe 50 percent derating already provided the necessary protection. Somecommenters, such as Unit Crane andamp; Shovel and the Organization ResourcesCounselors (Exs. 3-47 and 3-88), suggested that OSHA promulgate the provisionas proposed. Others, such as the Associated General Contractors of Americaand Granite Construction (Exs. 3-28 and 3-50), asserted that trial liftsshould only be required at the beginning of a shift. Granite Construction'scomment, however, reflected the mistaken impression that operators wouldhave to interrupt hoisting to perform a trial lift each time the <T3>platform </T3>was repositioned, even if the crane or derrick were notmoved. OSHA's intent is for operators to run the unoccupied platform throughall movements and positions necessary to do the work before permittingemployees aboard the platform. By contrast, a change in the set-up locationof the <T3>crane or derrick</T3>, the addition of one or more work locations tothose already reached from an existing set-up location, or a significantchange in the lift route, will require another trial lift. OSHA has determined that a trial lift should be performed directly beforepersonnel are hoisted, rather than at the beginning of a shift, as wasproposed. The Agency is concerned that a trial lift would not take intoaccount the circumstances under which personnel hoisting would take placeif the trial lift were conducted hours before the hoisting. Under thosecircumstances, the proposed trial lift might not provide the necessaryassurance that the lift would be completed safely.OSHA believes that the requirement as revised will impose a more reasonableregulatory burden on employers than did the requirement as proposed. Employerswill only need to perform trial lifts when they will actually be hoistingemployees, instead of having to perform them at the beginning of any shiftin which there is a possibility that they might need to hoist personnel.Therefore, OSHA has decided that this requirement, as revised, most effectivelyregulates the timing of trial lifts. Paragraph (g)(5)(ii) of this final rule requires that the trial lift berepeated whenever the crane is moved and set up in a new location or returnedto a previously used location. This provision is similar to and replacesparagraph (g)(5)(iii) of the proposal. In the proposal, OSHA required that the test lift at each new set-up locationbe conducted at 150 percent of the intended load. OSHA recognizes thatthe proposed language was not sufficiently clear. Several commenters apparentlymisconstrued the trial lift requirement as requiring a proof test of theplatform. For example, the Bechtel Power Corporation (Ex. 3-45) commentedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed requirement is excessive, costly and nonproductive. Weagree a load test of the personnel platform is a good practice but thereis no sense in requiring load testing more often than that for the crane.ANSI requires load testing of cranes at the time they first come on thejob or when modified or possibly damaged or on an annual basis.</ITAG>The National Constructors Association, Standard Oil Company (Indiana),the American Road and Transportation Builders Association, and the CarolinasBranch of the AGC, (Exs. 3-30, 3-46 3-65 and 3-82), opposed the proposedrequirement on the grounds that compliance would involve frequent handlingof materials, which could damage the platform and cause employee injury,and would require employers to carry test weights or ensure test weightsare available. On the other hand, many commenters, such as the Commonwealth of PuertoRico (Ex. 3-55) and the Milwaukee Construction Industry Safety Council(Ex. 3-26), supported the proposed trial lift requirements. Unit Craneandamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47) suggested that, in addition, OSHA require a triallift when a crane or derrick is moved back to a former set-up location.Further, the International Union of Operating Engineers testified:<ITAG tagnum="21">And whenever that crane is relocated, I mean, from coming around fromthis side of the building over to this other side of the building, andset up to work to operate again with a work platform, it should be testedagain. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Our feeling is that it should be tested again. Because, we're notjust testing, and load the sandbags in and take it up to the point wherethe work is going to be performed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">We're not just testing for the rigging or the stability of the crane,but we're testing for clearances on whatever obstructions there might be,like the edge of a building, or a tree over here, or a guide wire goingup to a stack. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">We're going to see if we can get the crane into this place with thiswork platform, with the men in it, without hitting any kind of an obstruction.So, we're testing for clearances, as well as for stability of the crane.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">And, of course, there could be something. There's always the possibilitythat there's an old manhole or a sewer or something down there. And weget this concentrated ground bearing pressure under an outrigger or underthe end of the cats or something, that we might drop down through. (Tr.424-425)</ITAG>OSHA agrees with the Operating Engineers' reasons for performing triallifts in these situations. Accordingly, based on the evidence in the record,the Agency is requiring that the employer conduct a trial lift, with theplatform loaded to the anticipated lift weight, at each new set-up locationand when returning to previously used locations. OSHA has relocated the provisions of proposed paragraph (g)(6)(vii) toparagraph (g)(5)(iii) in the final rule. This consolidates the inspectionand testing requirements in paragraph (g)(5), as suggested by the NationalConstructors Association (Ex. 3-30). Proposed paragraph (g)(6)(vii), whichis based on ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-2.4.2(a), requires testing and inspectionto ensure, prior to hoisting, that a personnel platform is secure and properlybalanced. In particular, the inspection must ensure that hoist ropes arefree of kinks; lines are not twisted around each other; the primary attachmentis centered over the platform; and all ropes are properly seated on drumsand in sheaves. Several commenters, including the American Road andamp; Transportation BuilderAssociation (ARTBA) (Ex. 3-65), stated that these proposed provisions wereunnecessary and should be deleted. In particular, the ARTBA contended thatthe determinations required under proposed paragraph (g)(6)(vii) couldbe made in conjunction with the trial lift. This was OSHA's intent, andin order to clarify this intent, the Agency now specifically states thatthis is to be done as part of the trial lift. OSHA has relocated these provisions, related to hoist rope and rigginginspection, to paragraph (g)(5)(iii) because the Agency believes that theydeserve specific mention as a reminder to employers that these items mustbe inspected at the end of the trial lift, and directly before actuallyhoisting personnel.Paragraph (g)(5)(iv) provides that a competent person shall inspect theequipment and base support or ground immediately after a trial lift, todetermine whether the test exposed any defects or had any adverse effects.This requirement is virtually identical to proposed paragraph (g)(5)(iii)(A).The added ``competent person'' requirement reflects input from the ACCSH(Tr. 5-23-83 pp. 148-149) and is intended to ensure that the designatedperson has the skill, experience and authority to perform the inspectionand have any defects repaired. Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (3-47) suggestedthat OSHA specifically require employers to inspect the rigging after atrial lift. The Agency intended the employers to include the rigging whenthey performed their post-trial lift inspection. For the sake of clarity,OSHA has revised this provision as suggested. Therefore, OSHA promulgatesparagraph (g)(5)(iv) as renumbered and revised. Paragraph (g)(5)(v) requires that employers correct any defects found duringan inspection before hoisting personnel. This provision is identical toproposed paragraph (g)(5)(iii)(B). There were no comments regarding thisrequirement. Therefore, OSHA promulgates proposed paragraph (g)(5)(iii)(B)as paragraph (g)(5)(v). Paragraph (g)(5)(vi) requires that employers proof test their personnelplatforms and hoist rigging at 125 percent of the rated capacity of theplatform, with the test load evenly distributed on the platform. The prooftest is to be performed prior to hoisting personnel for the first timeat a work site, or whenever the platform or rigging has been repaired ormodified. This provision, based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 7.2, has beenadded because of OSHA's concern that employees might otherwise be hoistedunsafely in personnel platforms whose structural integrity may have beencompromised by damage, repair or modification. In its discussion of proposedparagraph (g)(4)(ii)(F), covering welding (49 FR 6286), OSHA requestedinput regarding the need for proof testing and the appropriate weight andprocedure. Unit Crane andamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47) recommended that ``the platformbe proof tested after fabrication and certified to have withstood a loadfive times its assigned capacity rating.'' The Specialized Carriers andRigging Association (Ex. 3-54) noted that ``B30.9 of ANSI requires thatall welded assemblies used in overhead lifting (personnel platform) mustbe proof tested to twice their rated capacity.'' The Commonwealth of PuertoRico (Ex. 3-55) recommended proof testing at 150 percent of rated capacityafter fabrication, and the Boeing Company and Boeing Aerospace (Exs. 3-38and 3-57) recommended proof testing at 200 percent every three months,if the platform is in continual use. In addition, Bechtel (Ex. 3-45) suggestedthat OSHA require proof testing at 125 percent of the rated capacity ofthe personnel platform. The State of California (Ex. 3-33) recognized proof testing as an option,but suggested that OSHA instead require personnel platform certificationby an engineer, coupled with periodic inspection by a competent person.OSHA has determined that proof testing at each job site is the most effectiveway to evaluate structural integrity, because the testing would detectdeficiencies in fabrication and any damage caused in transit. OSHA alsobelieves that a platform certification requirement is unnecessary becausethe required proof testing and inspection requirements would disclose anydefects. OSHA believes that field proof testing at 200 percent of the rated capacitycould possibly permanently deform structural members. The Agency has furtherdetermined that suspending the platform for five minutes, loaded at 125percent of the rated capacity, is considered an adequate, non-destructivefield test and will provide the necessary assurance that any defect inthe platform or rigging would be detected and corrected before any personnelwere hoisted. Therefore, new paragraph (g)(5)(vi) incorporates such a requirement.Paragraph (g)(6) addresses work practices which the Agency has determinedwill enhance the safety of workers being hoisted in personnel platforms.Paragraph (g)(6)(i) of this final rule requires that hoisted employeeskeep all parts of their bodies inside the platform during raising, loweringand positioning. This provision, which is based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section12.6, is identical to the proposed provision, except that the Agency hasadded an explanation which states that the requirement does not apply toan occupant of the platform performing the duties of a signal person. Thus,the paragraph, as promulgated, takes into account a common sense considerationwhich was overlooked in the proposal. OSHA determined that this revisionwas needed based on comments submitted by Magma Copper and Bechtel (Exs.3-27 and 3-45). The Construction Industry Manufacturers Association (Ex.3-31) expressed support for the provision as proposed. Proposed paragraph (g)(6)(ii) required that the platform be landed or securedto the structure before employees enter or exit the platform. This provisionwas based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 12.7. One commenter, the State ofMaryland (Ex. 3-19), disagreed with the proposed requirement, stating that``securing the platform to another structure can be dangerous.'' On theother hand, commenters such as the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico (Ex. 3-55)supported the proposed provision. In addition, Unit Crane andamp; Shovel(Ex. 3-47) commented that ``it is unclear what structure OSHA is referringto.'' Unit Crane suggested that OSHA use the term ``stable structure.''Unit Crane also noted that the movement of workers in a personnel platformcould cause dangerous instability and suggested that the hoisted platformbe secured to a ``stable structure'' whenever employees were working eitherin the platform or outside.OSHA has reviewed the evidence in the record regarding this issue and agreesthat the language of this provision needs to be clarified. In responseto Unit Crane's concern, the Agency is revising the paragraph to make itclear that the platform is to be secured to ``the structure where the workis to be performed * * *.''. On the other hand, the Agency concluded thata requirement to secure the platform to a ``stable structure'' would beinappropriate for certain work activities, such as demolition, where securingto the structure would create an unsafe condition. Indeed, OSHA recognizesthat there are circumstances where there is no structure to which it ispossible to secure the platform safely, and has revised the paragraph accordingly.Therefore, OSHA has decided to promulgate this provision as revised. Paragraph (g)(6)(iii) of the final rule is identical to the proposed provision.This provision, which is based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 12.8, requiresthe use of tag lines, unless the use of a tag line creates an unsafe condition.The Agency believes, based on ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.1.4(m) andthe <T3>Crane Handbook </T3>(Ex. 5-2D), that compliance with this provisionwill be an important element in ensuring that any hoisting while traveling,as regulated by paragraph (g)(7) below, proceeds safely. The Agency receivedfew comments on this provision. Kerr-McGee (Ex. 3-23) commented that theuse of a tag line as a means of controlling platform motion was preferableto the use of rotation resistant wire rope. In addition, the MilwaukeeConstruction Industry Safety Council (Ex. 3-26) and Organization ResourcesCounselors (Ex. 3-89) expressed support for the proposed requirement. Therefore,OSHA promulgates the requirement as proposed. Proposed paragraph (g)(6)(iv), which prohibited traveling with personnelsuspended on a hoisted platform, has been deleted. Traveling is now addressedin paragraph (g)(7), below. Proposed paragraph (g)(6)(v) has been redesignated as paragraph (g)(6)(iv)in the final rule. The proposed provision required that the crane or derrickoperator remain at the controls at all times when hoisting employees. Therequirement was based on ANSI A10.28-1983, section 12.4, and B30.5-1982,section 5-3.2.2(a)(12), which provide that the crane or derrick operatorshall stay at the controls while the platform is suspended. Boeing (Ex.3-38) and Standard Oil (Indiana) (Ex. 3-46) agreed that this requirementshould only apply when the platform was suspended. In addition, Unit Craneandamp; Shovel (Ex. 3-47) suggested that the crane operator remain at thecontrols, with ``attention directed to the platform at all times when theplatform is suspended.'' Unit Crane recognized that careful regulatorydrafting would be necessary to ensure that compliance with this requirementdid not detract from the performance of the operator's other duties. OSHAbelieves that a requirement for the operator to remain at the controlsand carefully conduct the lift ((g)(3)(i)(A)) will ensure that the necessaryattention is paid to the position of the platform. Therefore, OSHA hasresponded to Unit Crane's concern, but has not adopted the suggested language.Also, the Construction Industry Manufacturers Association (CIMA) and theBoilermakers Union (Exs. 3-31 and 3-53) stated that the operator shouldremain at the controls while the platform is ``occupied.'' The CIMA emphasizedthe alertness required to ensure the safety of platform passengers whilethe crane engine is running, and the Boilermakers Union was particularlyconcerned that hoisted personnel would be endangered if the operator leftthe controls once the platform had been hoisted to and secured at its workingposition. OSHA agrees with the CIMA and Boilermakers Union that the operator shouldbe at the controls once the crane engine is running and the personnel platformis occupied, because inadvertent movement by the crane before hoistingor after landing could cause injuries. Therefore, OSHA has revised thisparagraph to require that the operator remain at the controls wheneverthe crane engine is running and the personnel platform is occupied. Paragraph (g)(6)(v) requires that employers discontinue personnel hoistingpromptly when there are indications that hoisted employees would be exposedto dangerous weather conditions or other impending danger. This provisionis virtually identical to paragraph (g)(6)(vi) of the proposed standard.The Agency has added the word ``promptly'' to this paragraph, as recommendedby the Construction Industry Manufacturers Association (Ex. 3-31). TheAgency believes that this modification clarifies its regulatory intent.Some commenters suggested that OSHA set a specific wind speed at whichoperations would be discontinued (Ex. 3-31 and 3-46). Other commenters,such as the Boeing Company (Ex. 3-38), suggested that OSHA specify theweather conditions under which employers would be required to discontinuepersonnel hoisting operations. OSHA believes that it is neither possiblenor necessary to compile such a list, because circumstances vary so muchbetween construction sites. Indeed, the ACCSH declined to suggest morespecific language for this provision because it felt that a broadly wordedrequirement was needed to cover the many hazards which could arise (Tr.5-23-83 pp. 147-148). OSHA also notes that its enforcement efforts wouldbe adversely affected if problems arose due to conditions not specificallyincluded in a list.In addition, the Boilermakers Union (Ex. 3-53) suggested that OSHA requirea ``constant monitor'' to detect hazardous gases when employees are hoistedto repair the tops of foundry stacks, coke ovens and other chimneys atfacilities where normal operations are continuing. Although OSHA is concernedthat hoisted employees could be harmed by toxic materials, the hazardsraised by the Boilermakers are already regulated by other constructionstandards, such as the permissible exposure limits set forth in andSection;1926.55. Therefore, the Agency believes that it is not necessary to adoptthe suggested revision. The provisions of proposed paragraph (g)(6)(vii) have been moved to paragraph(g)(5) and have been discussed above. Paragraph (g)(6)(vi) of this final rule, which is virtually identical toproposed paragraph (g)(6)(viii), requires that employees being hoistedremain in continuous sight of and in direct communication with the operatoror signal person, while allowing the use of direct communications aloneonly if the circumstances warrant. This provision is consistent with ANSIA10.28-1983, sections 11.1 and 11.2, and with B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.2(a)(15).Proposed paragraph (g)(6)(viii) required in all circumstances both continuousvisual contact, and communication with the operator or signal person. OSHAreceived written comments and hearing testimony which indicated that radiosor other means of communication would enable the hoist to proceed safelywhen direct visual contact with the operator or signal person was impossibleor unsafe. A representative of Sigma Associates, Ltd. testified as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">I can envision times when it's going to be impractical and reallyunsafe to place a signalman in a position where he would have view of thecrane operator as well as the personnel work platform. So I can see someconditions where it would not be possible or practical to have a signalmanin view and, under these conditions, would recommend that communicationswould be permitted in lieu of the signalman concept. (Tr. 39)</ITAG>Several other commenters suggested that OSHA permit the use of two-wayaudio communication equipment as an alternative to visual contact. Somecommenters, such as Morrison-Knudsen Co. and Standard Oil Company (Indiana)(3-9 and 3-46), stated that audio contact was appropriate where visualcontact could be lost in the course of the hoisting operation, such aswhere employees are hoisted inside a silo or furnace stack. Other commenters,such as the National Constructors Association, Boeing Aerospace and theOrganization Resources Counselors (Exs. 3-30, 3-57 and 3-89), stated thataudio contact was a satisfactory means of maintaining communication. OSHA has determined that there are circumstances where it would be impossibleor unsafe for hoisted personnel to maintain visual contact with the signalperson or crane operator. In particular, the Agency believes that stationinga signal person atop a chimney or silo to observe hoist operations wouldbe dangerous. Therefore, OSHA has revised the proposed standard to providethat hoisted employees may use direct communication, such as audio contact,as an alternative to continuous sight when it would be more dangerous forthe signal person to remain in continuous sight. Paragraph (g)(6)(vii) of this final rule is essentially the same as paragraph(g)(6)(ix) of the proposed standard, except that proposed paragraph (g)(6)(ix)provided only for the use of body belts. The final rule reflects the ACCSHrecommendations for flexible approaches to protection of hoisted personnelfrom fall hazards (Tr. 5-23-83 p. 143). This provision requires employeesoccupying a personnel platform to use a body belt or harness system, witha lanyard attached to either the load block, overhaul ball or a structuralmember of the platform capable of supporting the anticipated fall impact.This provision is based on ANSI A10.28-1983, sections 10.1 and 10.2. However,at the suggestion of the Boeing Company (Ex. 3-38), OSHA has added theoption for personnel to use a body harness system to comply with this provision.Several commenters, including the Panama Canal Commission (Ex. 3-51) andStandard Oil Company (Indiana) (Ex. 3-46), asserted that the tie-off requirement,especially during over water operations, would be hazardous. The PanamaCanal Commission pointed out that:<ITAG tagnum="21">In the event of cable or crane failure, employees attached to thework platform by belts or lanyards would be dragged under with the droppedplatform.</ITAG>In addition, the American Road and Transportation Builders Association(ARTBA) (Ex. 3-65) commented that the proposed provision was ``not realistic.''ARTBA stated that tie-off should not be required ``where it creates anotherhazardous situation.'' OSHA recognizes that there is a basis for special concern regarding craneor cable failure over water, and has incorporated this suggestion intothis revised paragraph. In addition, OSHA notes that the revision is consistentwith the existing andSection; 1926.106 which requires specific precautionsfor all construction work over water. Proposed paragraph (g)(6)(x) has been relocated to paragraph (g)(4)(iv)(E)of the final rule so that all provisions related to rigging are consolidated.The provisions of that paragraph are discussed as part of paragraph (g)(4).OSHA has added a new paragraph (g)(6)(viii) to the final rule. This provisionprohibits cranes or derricks being used to hoist personnel from hoistingany other loads at the same time. OSHA added this paragraph because, asnoted by several commenters, including the Construction Industry ManufacturingAssociation and the National Roofing Constructors Association (Exs. 3-31and 3-59), the use of other lines would endanger hoisted personnel dueto risks of entanglement and destabilization. OSHA has added a new paragraph (g)(7) to the final rule in order to providerequirements for cranes which need to travel with employees suspended ina personnel platform. Proposed paragraph (g)(6)(iv) prohibited hoisting personnel while the supportingcrane was traveling, except where a portal or tower crane was operatingon andamp; fixed track. This proposed provision reflected OSHA's concernthat a crane moving across a construction site would be unable to maintainthe stability necessary to protect employees from tipping or other hazards.OSHA notes that section 5-3.2.2(a)(14) of ANSI B30.5-1982 prohibits ``travelwhile personnel are on the platform.'' On the other hand, ANSI A10.28-1983,section 12.9, provides that cranes shall not travel while hoisting personnel,``except under carefully controlled conditions.'' In Issue 9, the Agencypresented questions regarding the circumstances which would make it necessaryfor a truck or crawler crane to travel while hoisting personnel.Several commenters, such as the State of Alaska, Granite Construction Companyand the Spartan Equipment Company (Exs. 3-4, 3-50 and 3-82), stated thattraveling while hoisting was sometimes necessary in order to protect employeesfrom greater hazards. In particular, Alaska stated that the decision shouldbe based on the weather, terrain, the height to which personnel would behoisted and the obstacles anticipated in lowering and rehoisting personneland suggested that employers be required to demonstrate the need for travel.Also, Granite Construction stated that traveling while hoisting would benecessary where the crane was so hemmed in by structures that the boomcould not be adjusted to reach all work stations. Granite Constructionand Spartan Equipment stated that limited travel should be permitted toposition the crane properly. In addition, the AGC of America (Exs. 3-28and 3-67) stated that the proposed provision was too restrictive and unrealisticin light of workplace realities. The AGC suggested that OSHA permit travelwhen the terrain is firm, smooth and even; when traveling is done at avery slow speed; when travel is limited to the radius of the boom; whenthe boom is parallel to the direction of travel; and with outriggers, ifequipped, fully extended with rams no more than 50 percent raised. The National Constructors Association and the State of California (Exs.3-30, and 3-33) generally favored prohibition of traveling, subject toexception for minor movement for final positioning. California added that``traveling on rail, prepared level pads, or concrete floors could be acceptable.''The State of Maryland (Ex. 3-19) also commented that hoisting while travelingon rails was acceptable. Other commenters, such as Ebasco Constructors, Inc., Unit Crane andamp; Shoveland the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico (Exs. 3-6, 3-47 and 3-55), suggestedthat OSHA prohibit travel. Ebasco Constructors noted the continual ``changesin the physical surrounding'' and the high rate of employee turnover asreasons why traveling would be unsafe. Unit Crane andamp; Shovel stated thateven slightly uneven terrain could cause a personnel platform to bounceand swing, and that traveling would cause stability and occupant footingproblems. Unit Crane and Puerto Rico noted that swinging of the boom duringtravel was a particularly dangerous situation. Norpac Engineering, Inc.(Ex. 3-88) commented that cranes should not be allowed to travel whilehoisting and that requiring mobile cranes to deploy their outriggers whilehoisting would ensure that cranes would not travel. The Parsons Corporation (Ex. 3-22) supported the proposed ban on travelby truck or crawler cranes while hoisting. Parsons also suggested thatOSHA regulate travel by cranes on fixed tracks to ensure that the speedand path of movement are safe. Sigma Associates, in its hearing testimony (Tr. 48-49), stated that itknew of ``no condition where a pneumatic or rubber tired crane or evena crawler would * * * need to travel.'' Sigma Associates emphasized theimportance of ensuring that the crane was supported on a firm level surfaceand indicated that travel would detract from crane stability and wouldendanger employees. OSHA has determined, based on the evidence in the record, that hoistingof employees while traveling is, in general, an extremely dangerous practice.Therefore, the Agency has prohibited the practice, <T3>except </T3>under very limited circumstances. Because this practiceis so inherently dangerous, OSHA has determined that the ANSI A10.28 requirementfor ``careful control'' of operations is not sufficient to protect employeesfrom the hazards of traveling. The Agency has determined that a prohibitionagainst all hoisting while traveling, except as set forth in paragraph(g)((7) of this standard, is the only way to ensure that personnel hoistingis done only in those situations where it is necessary, and not just foran employer's convenience. OSHA notes that the Panama Canal Commission(Ex. 3-51) has had successful experience with locomotive cranes and agreesthat those types of cranes should be included, along with tower and portalcranes, in the exception to the prohibition. In addition, OSHA believesthat the circumstances where other kinds of cranes would need to travelwhile hoisting are so rare that the proper course is to require an employerto demonstrate to OSHA, as suggested by the State of Alaska (Ex. 3-4),that traveling is necessary to avoid greater hazards while performing work.Paragraph (g)(7)(i) prohibits cranes from traveling while hoisting employees,except for portal, tower and locomotive cranes, or where the employer demonstratesthat there is no less hazardous way for employees to perform their work.This paragraph, which is similar to proposed paragraph. (g)(6)(iv), addsexceptions for personnel hoisting operations involving locomotive craneand other circumstances where traveling has been shown to be necessary.OSHA stresses that this practice would still have to satisfy all of theother requirements of the standard so that employees would be hoisted safely.This provision reflects a recommendation from Granite Construction (Ex.3-50) which commented:<ITAG tagnum="21">Hoisting of personnel while the crane travels should be permittedto a limited extent under carefully controlled conditions where necessitatedby worksite restrictions.</ITAG>Other commenters, including the State of Alaska (Ex. 3-4), The NationalConstructors Association (Ex. 3-30), and the Spartan Equipment Company(Ex. 3-82) also suggested that OSHA allow some travel under controlledconditions, when the circumstances required it.Paragraph (g)(7)(ii) provides additional rules that must be followed whencranes travel while hoisting employees. Paragraph (g)(7)(ii)(A) requires crane travel to be restricted to a fixedtrack or runway. This provision is similar to the exception in proposedparagraph (g)(6)(iv). OSHA has added provision for traveling on a ``runway,''as defined in paragraph (g)(1)(ii)(E), to reflect recognition that theremay be cranes, other than those on fixed tracks, which need to travel whilehoisting personnel. This requirement, as revised, reflects comments fromthe State of California (CAL/OSHA) (Ex. 3-33) and the approved revisionof ANSI A10.28-1983, which has not yet been published. In particular, CAL/OSHAstated that ``traveling on rail, prepared level pads, or concrete floorscould be acceptable.'' Paragraph (g)(7)(ii)(B) limits travel to the load radius of the boom usedduring the lift. This requirement was suggested by the AGC of America (Ex.3-28) and Granite Construction (Ex. 3-50). Therefore, if travel would exceedthe boom radius used during a particular personnel hoisting operation,the crane operator would be required to lower the platform, unload theoccupants, reposition the crane, and perform another trial lift at thenew position, before resuming the hoist operations. OSHA believes thatthis limitation will ensure that only the minimal, necessary travelingtakes place. Paragraph (g)(7)(ii)(C) requires that the boom be parallel to the directionof travel. This requirement, also suggested by the AGC (Ex. 3-28) and GraniteConstruction (Ex. 3-50), is consistent with ANSI B30.5-1982, section 5-3.2.1.4(m)which covers travel while hoisting material. This provision is intendedto minimize the possibility that the crane will tip over, due to swingingof the boom and platform during travel. Paragraph (g)(7)(ii)(D) requires that an employer perform a complete trialrun before allowing employees on the platform. OSHA intends this requirementto supplement the requirements of paragraph (g)(5). It imposes only a nominaladditional burden, because all testing requirements can be satisfied throughone full cycle trial lift or run. This provision reminds the employer totest the route of travel as well as the route of the lift. Paragraph (g)(7)(ii)(E) provides requirements for travel by rubber-tiredcranes, reflecting OSHA's concern that rubber-tired cranes have lower capacityratings than crawler cranes. These provisions are based on generally acceptedgood safety practice and comments received from the AGC of America (Ex.3-28). Paragraph (g)(8) requires that a pre-lift meeting be held prior to thetrial lift. This paragraph reflects a suggestion received from the ACCSHat the May 23-24, 1983 meeting (Tr. 149-150), and is very similar to proposedparagraph (g)(7). The pre-lift meeting requirements have been modifiedslightly to clarify the Agency's regulatory intent. One commenter, the Farm and Industrial Equipment Institute (FIEI) (Ex.3-37), suggested that OSHA require employers to document, in writing, thatthey have complied with the standard. The FIEI stated ``such documentationwill fix accountability, aid enforcement and immeasurably improve the overalleffectiveness of the rule in actual practice.'' Another commenter, theState of California (Ex. 3-33) suggested that OSHA require a written pre-liftplan. OSHA has determined that the suggested written plan and recordkeeping requirementsare not necessary. The procedures to be followed are clearly set forthand whether or not they have been followed can be readily determined byemployee interviews at the hoist site. The Agency has undertaken several recent rulemakings which follow the mandateof the Paperwork Reduction Act (44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3>) and section 8(d) of the OSH Act (29 U.S.C. 657(d) toreduce recordkeeping requirements where they do not significantly contributeto employee safety and, therefore, unnecessarily burden employers. Accordingly,OSHA is very concerned that there be a clear benefit from any additionalrecordkeeping requirements. OSHA believes that requiring employers to documenttheir compliance efforts, as suggested, would not significantly enhancethe protection provided to employees by this standard. Therefore, the Agencyhas not adopted the suggested paperwork requirements, and promulgates paragraph(g)(8) as revised. <ITAG tagnum="85">III. Final Analyses of Regulatory Impact, Regulatory Flexibility,and Environmental Impact </ITAG>The following is a summary of the final regulatory impact and regulatoryflexibility analyses prepared by OSHA for the final revised standard forcrane or derrick suspended personnel platforms. The full text of the documentmay be examined and copied in OSHA's Docket Office, 200 Constitution Avenue,NW., Room N-3670, Washington, DC, 20210; telephone (202) 523-7894.<ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Effects </ITAG>Affected Firms and Industries and Construction The hoisting of personnel occurs in construction firms classified undera broad range of four-digit Standard Industrial Classification Codes (SICs).OSHA has determined that the final rule could potentially affect all firmswithin SICs 1541, Industrial Buildings and Warehouses; 1542, Nonresidential,not elsewhere classified; 1622, Bridge, Tunnel, and Elevated Highway Construction;1629, Heavy Construction, Not Elsewhere Classified; 1791, Steel Erection;and 1795, Demolition. There were 42,804 firms in these SICs in 1982, andOSHA estimates that the number increased to about 45,000 firms in 1987.However, a number of these firms may adopt alternative means for hoistingpersonnel, such as aerial lifts, once the standard is implemented. In addition to directly affecting the construction industry, the finalrule will also indirectly affect the crane manufacturing industry and thefirms that sell, lease, or rent cranes. In 1983, there were 26 companiesthat manufactured the types of cranes covered by the final rule, 7 of whichwere considered large companies. Crane rental agencies buy about 60 percentof all new construction cranes and construction companies buy most of theremainder. Feasibility, Benefits, and Costs OSHA has determined that compliance with this standard is technologicallyfeasible. The standard does not require any devices that are not presentlyavailable for use on cranes and derricks. However, some cranes, especiallythe older mechanical ones, would require considerable modification in orderto comply with the standard. The benefits of the rule accrue to those workers who are at risk from currenthoisting practices in the construction industry. Although the JACA Corp.,OSHA's contractor, was unable to estimate the total number of workers whowould benefit from the final standard due to the infrequency of such operationsand the wide diversity of potentially affected workers, JACA was able toestimate the rate of injuries per lift. It is estimated that 1 injury occursfor every 36,500 persons lifted and that 3 fatalities and 3 nonfatal injuriesoccur each year as a result of crane- or derrick-suspended platform accidents.OSHA concludes that compliance with the final standard will avert mostof these predicted fatalities and nonfatal injuries. In fact, a reviewof the experience of the states with stringent suspended platform rulesin place for five years revealed no accidents during the five-year period.Using current industry practice as a baseline, OSHA estimates that theannualized costs of full compliance with the final standard would be $5.8million in 1987 and $5.5 million each for the years 1988-1991. The costof using substitutes where they are a safe alternative to hoisting personnelby means of cranes or derricks accounts for over half of the estimatedannual compliance cost for this baseline. The costs of retrofitting orconverting cranes, retrofitting or building personnel platforms, and providinglocking hooks and test weights comprise about 26% of the total cost. Delay-of-job,pre-lift meeting, and familiarization costs comprise the remainder. Ifall firms were in full compliance with the current OSHA Directive on workplatforms suspended from crane booms, the cost of the proposed changeswould be $2.8 million in 1987, and from $2.4 million to $2.6 million onan annual basis over the 1988-1991 period. There would be no cost for thesubstitution of alternative hosting methods because the current OSHA Directiverequires the use of less hazardous substitutes. This category representsthe bulk of the cost difference between the two baselines. Economic Effect JACA used model firms to characterize the impacts on major users of suspendedplatforms. JACA estimated that the percentage increases in prices thatwould be needed for model firms to pass forward their compliance costsfully to their customers were insignificant; none would exceed 0.1 percent.JACA also calculated the effects of compliance costs on return-on-assetsand profit margins assuming costs would be fully absorbed by model firms,and concluded that the decline in the rates of return on assets and profitmargins was insignificant for all size firms. JACA concluded further thatfirms would be able to pass on most of their incremental costs to customers,and projected that compliance with the proposed standard would not resultin decreased competition within the affected sectors of the constructionindustry as compliance costs are not likely to force the closure of anyfirms. In view of these factors, OSHA concludes that compliance with thisfinal rule is economically feasible.OSHA has assumed that crane manufacturers would be able to pass forwardto the construction industry the increased costs of their product attributableto the standard because the magnitude of the costs is small. But if itwere assumed that manufacturers would not be able to pass forward the increasedcosts, any adverse financial effects would be mitigated by the very smallproportion of total output represented by cranes used for personnel hoisting.OSHA therefore concludes that the final rule will have no adverse economiceffects on the crane manufacturing industry. <ITAG tagnum="85">Regulatory Flexibility Certification and Environmental Impact Assessment</ITAG>Regulatory Flexibility Certification Pursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>), OSHA has assessed the impact of the final rule and concludesthat it would not significantly affect a substantial number of small entities.Specialization and the highly fragmented nature of the market structurein the construction industry tend to minimize the extent of direct competitionbetween small and large firms. Assuming that the full cost of compliance would be passed through, OSHAestimated the economic impacts according to firm size by examining therelationship between compliance costs (in both low and high-cost estimates)and annual contract revenues for three size categories of model firms (annualrevenues of $11 million, $50 million, and $250 million). The ratio of thesecosts to annual revenues was nearly proportional across all size categoriesfor both low and high cost estimates, in no case exceeding 0.1 percent.However, if firms would be forced to absorb all of their compliance costs,OSHA found that the percentage decline in the profit margins of small firmswould be slightly greater than for larger firms under both cost estimates.Under the low cost estimate, the small firm's profitability declined anaverage 1.7 percent over the five year period while the large firm's profitabilitydeclined an average 1.5 percent. Under the high cost estimate, the smallfirm's profitability declined 5 percent over the five years while the largefirm's profitability declined 3 percent. The significance of the differentialimpact on profit margins is reduced by the likelihood that all firms inthe industry should be able to pass on a substantial portion, if not all,of their compliance costs. OSHA believes the demand for the projects builtby construction firms which rely on hoisting of personnel by cranes andderricks is inelastic. Therefore, construction firms would have no incentiveto underbid on projects requiring cranes since they would be unable toreduce operating costs merely by using equipment other than cranes to hoistpersonnel platforms or by redesigning structures to eliminate the use ofcranes. In effect, both large and small firms will shift costs forwardto the buyer. For these reasons, OSHA concludes that small entities would not be significantlyaffected by the final rule. Environmental Impact Assessment This final rule has been reviewed in accordance with the requirements ofthe National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969 (42 U.S.C. 4231 <T3>et seq.</T3>), the Guidelines of the Council on Environmental Quality(CEQ) (40 CFR Parts 1500-1517), and the Department of Labor's NEPA Procedures(29 CFR Part 11). As the result of this review, the Assistant Secretaryof Labor for OSHA has determined that the final rule qualifies as a categoricallyexcluded action according to Subpart B, andSection; 11.10 of the DOL NEPAregulations and that the final rule would have no significant environmentalimpact. OSHA's final rule contains provisions for work practices which will enhanceworker safety and reduce safety hazards from the hoisting of personnelplatforms by cranes and derricks. The provisions include design criteriafor cranes, derricks, and platforms; inspection and testing of cranes andderricks; required test lifts; and pre-lift meetings. Because the finalrule focuses on the reduction of accident or injury by means of compliancewith design criteria and work practices and procedures, it does not impacton air, water, or soil quality, plant or animal life, the use of land orother aspects of the environment. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Recordkeeping </ITAG>The recordkeeping requirements in this standard have been approved by theOffice of Management and Budget (OMB) under the Paperwork Reduction Actof 1980, 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq. </T3>The approval number is 1218-0151 and the approval hasbeen granted until June, 1991. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1926 </ITAG>Construction safety, Construction industry, Cranes, Derricks, Hoisting,Personnel platform, Rigging. <ITAG tagnum="84">V. State Plan Standards </ITAG>The 25 States with their own OSHA-approved Occupational Safety and Healthplans must adopt a comparable standard within six months of this publicationdate. These States are: Alaska, Arizona, California, Connecticut,\1\<NOTE/> Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland, Michigan, Minnesota,Nevada, New Mexico, New York,\1\ North Carolina, Oregon, Puerto Rico, SouthCarolina, Tennessee, Utah, Vermont, Virginia, Virgin Islands, Washington,and Wyoming. Until such time as a State standard is promulgated, FederalOSHA will provide interim enforcement assistance, as appropriate. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Plan covers only State and local government employees.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Authority </ITAG>This document was prepared under the direction of John A. Pendergrass,Assistant Secretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210. Accordingly, pursuant to sections 4, 6(b), and 8(g) of the OccupationalSafety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657), section 107 ofthe Construction Safety Act (40 U.S.C. 333), Secretary of Labor's OrderNo. 9-83 (48 FR 35736), and 29 CFR Part 1911, 29 CFR Part 1926 is amendedas set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC this 26th day of 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John A. Pendergrass, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of Labor.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">29 CFR Part 1926 is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1926_SAFETY AND HEALTH REGULATIONS FOR CONSTRUCTION </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Subpart N of Part 1926 is revised to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 107, Contract Work Hours and Safety StandardsAct (Construction Safety Act) (40 U.S.C. 333); secs. 4, 6, 8, OccupationalSafety and Health Act of 1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor'sOrder No. 12-71 (36 FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (49 FR 35736),as applicable. Section 1926.550 also issued under 29 CFR Part 1911.</ITAG>2. In andSection; 1926.550, a new paragraph (g) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1926.550 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cranes and derricks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(g) <T3>Crane or derrick suspended personnel platforms_</T3>(1) <T3>Scope, application and definitions_</T3>(i) <T3>Scope and application. </T3>This standard applies to the design, construction,testing, use and maintenance of personnel platforms, and the hoisting ofpersonnel platforms on the load lines of cranes or derricks. (ii) <T3>Definitions. </T3>For the purposes of this paragraph (g), the followingdefinitions apply: (A) ``Failure'' means load refusal, breakage, or separation of components.(B) ``Hoist'' (or hoisting) means all crane or derrick functions such aslowering, lifting, swinging, booming in and out or up and down, or suspendinga personnel platform. (C) ``Load refusal'' means the point where the ultimate strength is exceeded.(D) ``Maximum intended load'' means the total load of all employees, tools,materials, and other loads reasonably anticipated to be applied to a personnelplatform or personnel platform component at any one time. (E) ``Runway'' means a firm, level surface designed, prepared and designatedas a path of travel for the weight and configuration of the crane beingused to lift and travel with the crane suspended platform. An existingsurface may be used as long as it meets these criteria. (2) <T3>General requirements. </T3>The use of a crane or derrick to hoist employeeson a personnel platform is prohibited, except when the erection, use, anddismantling of conventional means of reaching the worksite, such as a personnelhoist, ladder, stairway, aerial lift, elevating work platform or scaffold,would be more hazardous, or is not possible because of structural designor worksite conditions. (3) <T3>Cranes and derricks_</T3>(i) <T3>Operational criteria. </T3>(A) Hoisting of the personnel platform shallbe performed in a slow, controlled, cautious manner with no sudden movementsof the crane or derrick, or the platform. (B) Load lines shall be capable of supporting, without failure, at leastseven times the maximum intended load, except that where rotation resistantrope is used, the lines shall be capable of supporting without failure,at least ten times the maximum intended load. The required design factoris achieved by taking the current safety factor of 3.5 (required underandSection; 1926.550(b)(2)) and applying the 50 per cent derating of thecrane capacity which is required by andSection; 1926.550(g)(3)(i)(F). (C) Load and boom hoist drum brakes, swing brakes, and locking devicessuch as pawls or dogs shall be engaged when the occupied personnel platformis in a stationary working position. (D) The load line hoist drum shall have a system or device on the powertrain, other than the load hoist brake, which regulates the lowering rateof speed of the hoist mechanism (controlled load lowering.) Free fall isprohibited. (E) The crane shall be uniformly level within one percent of level gradeand located on firm footing. Cranes equipped with outriggers shall havethem all fully deployed following manufacturer's specifications, insofaras applicable, when hoisting employees. (F) The total weight of the loaded personnel platform and related riggingshall not exceed 50 percent of the rated capaciy for the radius and configurationof the crane or derrick. (G) The use of machines having live booms (booms in which lowering is controlledby a brake without aid from other devices which slow the lowering speeds)is prohibited.(ii) <T3>Instruments and components. </T3>(A) Cranes and derricks with variableangle booms shall be equipped with a boom angle indicator, readily visibleto the operator. (B) Cranes with telescoping booms shall be equipped with a device to indicateclearly to the operator, at all times, the boom's extended length, or anaccurate determination of the load radius to be used during the lift shallbe made prior to hoisting personnel. (C) A positive acting device shall be used which prevents contact betweenthe load block or overhaul ball and the boom tip (anti-two-blocking device),or a system shall be used which deactivates the hoisting action beforedamage occurs in the event of a two-blocking situation (two block damageprevention feature). (4) <T3>Personnel Platforms._</T3>(i) <T3>Design criteria. </T3>(A) The personnel platform and suspension systemshall be designed by a qualified engineer or a qualified person competentin structural design. (B) The suspension system shall be designed to minimize tipping of theplatform due to movement of employees occupying the platform. (C) The personnel platform itself, except the guardrail system and bodybelt/harness anchorages, shall be capable of supporting, without failure,its own weight and at least five times the maximum intended load. Criteriafor guardrail systems and body belt/harness anchorages are contained inother Subparts, E and M, respectively of this part. (ii) <T3>Platform specifications. </T3>(A) Each personnel platform shall beequipped with a guardrail system which meets the requirements of SubpartM, and, shall be enclosed at least from the toeboard to mid-rail with eithersolid construction or expanded metal having openings no greater than \1/2\inch (1.27 cm). (B) A grab rail shall be installed inside the entire perimeter of the personnelplatform. (C) Access gates, if installed, shall not swing outward during hoisting.(D) Access gates, including sliding or folding gates, shall be equippedwith a restraining device to prevent accidental opening. (E) Headroom shall be provided which allows employees to stand uprightin the platform. (F) In addition to the use of hard hats, employees shall be protected byoverhead protection on the personnel platform when employees are exposedto falling objects. (G) All rough edges exposed to contact by employees shall be surfaced orsmoothed in order to prevent injury to employees from punctures or lacerations.(H) All welding of the personnel platform and its components shall be performedby a qualified welder familiar with the weld grades, types and materialspecified in the platform design. (I) The personnel platform shall be conspicuously posted with a plate orother permanent marking which indicates the weight of the platform andits rated load capacity or maximum intended load. (iii) <T3>Personnel platform loading. </T3>(A) The personnel platform shall notbe loaded in excess of its rated load capacity. When a personnel platformdoes not have a rated load capacity then the personnel platform shall notbe loaded in excess of its maximum intended load. (B) The number of employees occupying the personnel platform shall notexceed the number required for the work being performed. (C) Personnel platforms shall be used only for employees, their tools,and the materials necessary to do their work, and shall not be used tohoist only materials or tools when not hoisting personnel. (D) Materials and tools for use during a personnel lift shall be securedto prevent displacement. (E) Materials and tools for use during a personnel lift shall be evenlydistributed within the confines of the platform while the platform is suspended.(iv) <T3>Rigging. </T3>(A) When a wire rope bridle is used to connect the personnelplatform to the load line, each bridle leg shall be connected to a masterlink or shackle in such a manner to ensure that the load is evenly dividedamong the bridle legs. (B) Hooks on overhaul ball assemblies, lower load blocks, or other attachmentassemblies shall be of a type that can be closed and locked, eliminatingthe hook throat opening. Alternatively, an alloy anchor type shackle witha bolt, nut and retaining pin may be used. (C) Wire rope, shackles, rings, master links, and other rigging hardwaremust be capable of supporting, without failure, at least five times themaximum intended load applied or transmitted to that component. Where rotationresistant rope is used, the slings shall be capable of supporting withoutfailure at least ten times the maximum intended load. (D) All eyes in wire rope slings shall be fabricated with thimbles. (E) Bridles and associated rigging for attaching the personnel platformto the hoist line shall be used only for the platform and the necessaryemployees, their tools and the materials necessary to do their work, andshall not be used for any other purpose when not hoisting personnel.(5) <T3>Trial lift, inspection, and proof testing. </T3>(i) A trial lift withthe unoccupied personnel platform loaded at least to the anticipated liftweightshall be made from ground level, or any other location where employeeswill enter the platform, to each location at which the personnel platformis to be hoisted and positioned. This trial lift shall be performed immediatelyprior to placing personnel on the platform. The operator shall determinethat all systems, controls and safety devices are activated and functioningproperly; that no interferences exist; and that all configurations necessaryto reach those work locations will allow the operator to remain under the50 percent limit of the hoist's rated capacity. Materials and tools tobe used during the actual lift can be loaded in the platform, as providedin paragraphs (g)(4)(iii) (D), and (E) of this section for the trial lift.A single trial lift may be performed at one time for all locations thatare to be reached from a single set up position. (ii) The trial lift shall be repeated prior to hoisting employees wheneverthe crane or derrick is moved and set up in a new location or returnedto a previously used location. Additionally, the trial lift shall be repeatedwhen the lift route is changed unless the operator determines that theroute change is not significant (i.e. the route change would not affectthe safety of hoisted employees.) (iii) After the trial lift, and just prior to hoisting personnel, the platformshall be hoisted a few inches and inspected to ensure that it is secureand properly balanced. Employees shall not be hoisted unless the followingconditions are determined to exist: (A) Hoist ropes shall be free of kinks; (B) Multiple part lines shall not be twisted around each other; (C) The primary attachment shall be centered over the platform; and (D) The hoisting system shall be inspected if the load rope is slack toensure all ropes are properly stated on drums and in sheaves. (iv) A visual inspection of the crane or derrick, rigging, personnel platform,and the crane or derrick base support or ground shall be conducted by acompetent person immediately after the trial lift to determine whetherthe testing has exposed any defect or produced any adverse effect uponany component or structure. (v) Any defects found during inspections which create a safety hazard shallbe corrected before hoisting personnel. (vi) At each job site, prior to hoisting employees on the personnel platform,and after any repair or modification, the platform and rigging shall beproof tested to 125 percent of the platform's rated capacity by holdingit in a suspended position for five minutes with the test load evenly distributedon the platform (this may be done concurrently with the trial lift). Afterprooftesting, a competent person shall inspect the platform and rigging.Any deficiencies found shall be corrected and another proof test shallbe conducted. Personnel hoisting shall not be conducted until the prooftesting requirements are satisfied. (6) <T3>Work practices. </T3>(i) Employees shall keep all parts of the bodyinside the platform during raising, lowering, and positioning. This provisiondoes not apply to an occupant of the platform performing the duties ofa signal person. (ii) Before employees exit or enter a hoisted personnel platform that isnot landed, the platform shall be secured to the structure where the workis to be performed, unless securing to the structure creates an unsafesituation. (iii) Tag lines shall be used unless their use creates an unsafe condition.(iv) The crane or derrick operator shall remain at the controls at alltimes when the crane engine is running and the platform is occupied. (v) Hoisting of employees shall be promptly discontinued upon indicationof any dangerous weather conditions or other impending danger. (vi) Employees being hoisted shall remain in continuous sight of and indirect communication with the operator or signal person. In those situationswhere direct visual contact with the operator is not possible, and theuse of a signal person would create a greater hazard for that person, directcommunication alone such as by radio may be used. (vii) Except over water, employees occupying the personnel platform shalluse a body belt/harness system with lanyard appropriately attached to thelower load block or overhaul ball, or to a structural member within thepersonnel platform capable of supporting a fall impact for employees usingthe anchorage. When working over water, the requirements of andSection; 1926.106shall apply. (viii) No lifts shall be made on another of the crane's or derrick's loadlineswhile personnel are suspended on a platform. (7) <T3>Traveling. </T3>(i) Hoisting of employees while the crane is travelingis prohibited, except for portal, tower and locomotive cranes, or wherethe employer demonstrates that there is no less hazardous way to performthe work. (ii) Under any circumstances where a crane would travel while hoistingpersonnel, the employer shall implement the following procedures to safeguardemployees: (A) Crane travel shall be restricted to a fixed track or runway; (B) Travel shall be limited to the load radius of the boom used duringthe lift; and (C) The boom must be parallel to the direction of travel. (D) A complete trial run shall be performed to test the route of travelbefore employees are allowed to occupy the platform. This trial run canbe performed at the same time as the trial lift required by paragraph (g)(5)(i)of this section which tests the route of the lift. (E) If travel is done with a rubber tired-carrier, the condition and airpressure of the tires shall be checked. The chart capacity for lifts onrubber shall be used for application of the 50 percent reduction of ratedcapacity. Notwithstanding paragraph (g)(3)(i)(E) of this section, outriggersmay be partially retracted as necessary for travel. (8) <T3>Pre-lift meeting. </T3>(i) A meeting attended by the crane or derrickoperator, signal person(s) (if necessary for the lift), employee(s) tobe lifted, and the person responsible for the task to be performed shallbe held to review the appropriate requirements of paragraph (g) of thissection and the procedures to be followed. (ii) This meeting shall be held prior to the trial lift at each new worklocation, and shall be repeated for any employees newly assigned to theoperation.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-17199 Filed 8-1-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>